Why is something better than nothing? Atheism doesn't answer your question and the "God did it" does not answer the why?
Finally, a virus that doesn't destroy your machine, just does enough to make you cry and move on.
No epithets were used, but that's one of the most racist speeches I've ever heard.
"Often icebergs are very unstable. The highly random shape and non-uniform melting and breakup of an iceberg leads to frequent shifts in orientation. Tabular bergs are generally the most stable whereas domed and wedge shaped bergs may roll completely over in seconds without any apparent provocation." http://www.icebergfinder.com/iceberg-guide/iceberg-faq.aspx
Holy crap that was really, really stupid, and I even \*like\* the stupid pictures now swamping reddit, 'cuz I don't normally see that stupid stuff. But that was stupid.
Is that a catch-22? Hit a depression, but get wacky tobaccy legal! I have no investments in real estate, hell no investments whatsoever, so I am passively rooting for the depression.
No, I hear they can catch fire if you do that.  A damaged passport will not be accepted and you will have to get a new one. Simply smashing it, as SmartParts recommended, leaves it intact but inactive.  There is no penalty (yet) for having a non-working RFID chip.  It does mean that the customs agent will have to inspect your passport manually instead of using the RFID reader, which could imply a more thorough examination.
Also the most sexist thing to happen to bottled water.
Dodge. I asked why IS there something rather than nothing.   Nothing about which is preferable.   EDIT:  Of course atheism doesn't answer it, since atheism is essentially the rejection of a proposition.  What I'm really asking is more explicitly:  What comprises the chain of causality that brought about our universe?  "God did it" certainly does answer that question (though it's not a particularly informative or practical answer), if you allow Him to have existed forever, and if you don't, you're denying the hypothesis of this proposition:  "I assert that God has been around forever and created the universe."
No, I'm certainly no Christian.  And I don't dowmnmod too often (too bad there's not visual code on reddit to show the ratio of upmods to downmodes for a user).  I am a very mellow person in real life situations.   I downmodded you for one reason.  "Pretard" is an incredibly stupid word, and by using it you are spreading stupidity. [edit - fixed formatting error.]
Umm... where did I say he was perfect? I didn't say he should be immune to criticism or satire either. I just said that the editor did something uncalled for. Buffet doesn't fit the profie of what he was trying to portray and it wasn't fair to him.
I don't know, those 17 yr old oranges are pretty hot.
Expected.  An automatic assumption that EVERYONE knows the Kennedy's.  What about people that don't keep up with politics?  Plus, someone from outside the US would know this, how exactly? Don't make assumptions.
There is a large difference between social corporatism (evil) and voluntary trade between individuals in a free market (good). While probably possessing the best intentions, I think the protesters' point could be significantly enhanced by pointing out that the problem with the modern-day economy is that we don't actually have free markets.  There's corporate welfare, legislation that allows companies to pollute the property of others, the military-industrial complex, protectionist trade barriers, legislation that requires you to get government permits before starting a business (more protection for existing corporations), so-called "intellectual property" legislation that prevents you from using your own property as you see fit, etc. These things ARE evil and ought to be opposed.
if you dont look like a supermodel or aren't rich then i dont want to talk to you.
I know I'm in the minority on this, but my biggest hope for PyPy is that a version of Stackless will pop out of it that works multicore. In the end PyPy could never get any faster but if it manages to make Python multicore that'd be enough for me. In the very near future paying even 50% performance for good multicore is going to start looking like a great deal....
The system now is broken. California, New York, Texas, and Illinois are all "out of play". So therefore citizens in those states don't matter when it comes to the general election. Where is the fairness in that? The only way you matter is if your state is "purple". In a direct election, actual votes are what matter. The winner of the vote count almost always wins the electoral college anyways. But under this system, there is integrity. Republicans want to get voters out to the polls in New York and California. Democrats want to raise their turn out in Texas.   
I’m flabbergasted that you have difficulty meeting nerdy, intelligent types. They’re not exactly hard to find. All you have to do is frequent the sort of places nerdy, intelligent males want to go. (And if you don’t want to be there, you probably aren’t suited to date ‘em)
The guy has a good counterpoint to my point.  It's called a fire-axe.
Q: What's the difference between the Spice Girls movie, and a porno? A: The porno has better music
Lets guestimate it.  Lets say that in a year the average person dumps just one gram of toxic metals down  the drain through flushing, drainage etc.  Just one gram that's added up from all the various crap you use that gets flushed out through sewage.  Lets make it less, lets say one tenth of a gram.  We'll be conservative and say just the city of chicago at 3 million people.  That's 300,000 grams or 660 pounds, and that's not even considering suburbs or Milwaukee.
Let me give you an example of how personal experience can be completely misrepresented. 5 people get struck by lightning and all have some sort experience:  "I feel dizzy"  "God saved my life"  "Krishna be praised"  "WTF was that?"  "The alien overlords have come" Whose experience is more valid? Which is true? If all five saw a glowing light and felt bliss, would all of them come to the same conclusion?
He doesn't fold the clothes the correct way! I give him little jobs so he doesn't do them wrong. Whining about no help and then bitching about help when they get it...
Get the your best and professional reviews from the expert of the web.The blog owner is professional blog writer reviews your site. 
20 outta 20, baby! And I'm registered, so I hit Finish and saw:   "You scored 20 of 20 boobs!  Thanks for taking my test! Be sure to tip your waitress. She has to pay for her implants. " And I'm not addicted to porn. :-)   
Why not a preemptive strike on Mecca? That "black cube" looks pretty menacing to me.  Millions of terrorists will be wandering around disoriented, because they will no longer re-align daily with the "black cube".    
Is it a typo when they say "Emperors can dive to 600m and stay underwater for 20 minutes".  A penguin at 600 meters??? I don't think so...
Hmm...apparently I was too distracted by the pictures to count properly. Either that or the comment was edited.
Goldwater got his ass handed to him in 64. Add 15 years, charm and nice hair.... voila, the Reagan revolution.
You can find the new interesting websites on this blog on finance and loans websites 
[What about FOUCAULTIAN STYLE POLICE SURVEILLANCE?](http://crave.cnet.co.uk/camcorders/0,39029423,49285395,00.htm)
You have not given a justification of why killing a human is immoral - if you feel you have , then please elucidate. It is not eating meat that I object to - even Buddhists are allowed to eat meat in some circumstances -  It is unnecessary cruelty I object to - particularly to the more intelligent animals - which I judge to suffer more, because of their advanced intellects - (what suffers more from the loss of a limb - a chimp or an ant?) And yes I oppose cruelty to all sentient animals, even fish.   
&gt;So you lump all people with that idea into one group. Well, yes.  I am lumping all people with that idea into the group of people who have that idea.  Neo-atheism is the dogma that religion is a net bad, and that differentiating between religions or between religionists is useless (even though they have a variety of ideas)--they should all be treated as the enemy. &gt;Uhm, if I criticize you, am I your enemy, a so called neo atheist?? No.
Lock &amp; load; Death to the W~Reich!
Ya know... you had a good counterpoint... until you threw that "young'un" stuff in there.  I hope it was sarcasm.  And if it was, you need to work on it.
Dad, stop moaning - tell your kid straight up the facts of life: you ain't rich; she ain't getting a convertible; she's getting a birthday at home with a birthday cake and a few presents (which cost under $100). Simple.
You're not making any sense?  My preconceived notions about what?  The fact that a mountain of debt can and does change a persons life, personality, mindset. I don't really see how you can argue against that. I'm not saying your financial situation is all the defines you as a human being but it does play a role, anyone who says otherwise is an idiot.
Its even worse: sailors thought *manatees* were mermaids.
I think you've raised a very interesting theoretical. Say your wife DID come to you and tell you there was an invisible dragon in the garage. Say for the sake of argument she was deadly, deadly serious, perhaps even frightened.  Knowing and trusting your wife as you do, you would be faced with choice of believing she was mentally ill (I'm supposing) or she was lying or...Just out of curiosity, what would it take for you to believe your wife was telling you the truth, that there WAS an invisible dragon in the garage and that you had to do something to get it out?  Then try the same game again except this time your wife comes and tells you Jesus lives in her heart. This is the nature of the question of a validity of human experience. Can we just discount it? Is what we believe only what we can verify personally? Because as I stated above, living that way is impossible.
I think she is supposed to be a stack of boulders...
ONE MAN ONE VOTE
ooooooldnews
Everything that has the word "sex" in it gets a lot of attention in here.   
That is the dictionary definition. It uses common usage as part of its definition. Look up evolution, it gives a host of definition and an incomplete one on biology. The proper definition of evolution is "the change of gene allele frequency in a population".  The strictest definition of Faith based on philosophy is the one that I stated.
&gt; In Colorado, what was proposed was to award all of the electoral college votes to the winner of the nationwide election. Perhaps Colorado has had multiple ballot measures, but  I was talking about 2004.   http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/6106804/ It was to award Colorado's electoral votes in proportion  to its state wide popular vote for each ticket. &gt; This is giving gerrymandered Congressional districts representation in the electoral college. Given the huge number of districts in CA, the effect of the distribution of electoral votes between the two parties would be the same under either the CA or CO ballot measure. Gerrymandering would, if anything, produce a result that would be closer to the popular vote. Whereas, in a non-gerrymandered state, award an electoral vote by district would tend to be give a disproportionate number of electoral votes to the state wide popular vote winner.  &gt; And I'd like to point out that we only have gerrymandering because of this notion that every Congressional district has to have roughly the same number of residents.  Yeah the notion that each person's vote should be worth  the same is a real downer. &gt; Sounds good on paper, but leads itself to constant re-drawing and manipulation. We'd be better off if Congressional districts had to be square or had to be counties or something. The simpler the system, the less prone to abuse. Gerrymandering exists because the state legislature in most states draws the districts. There's no reason why districts could not be non-gerrymandered and have rational shapes. E.g. Iowa:   http://www.legis.state.ia.us/Redist/congress.jpg Iowa has a non-partisan commission construct the congressional districts. Anyway, I think it much more fair for the largest state to  be the first to reform its electoral college that the smallest state.
Tool crushes everyone of those bands in terms of variety in their sound.
I know a lot of over-50s and not one of them want this. This article is a crock of shit.
and yet how is that fair? Are the interests of North Dakotans more important than those of Californians?
I think it's a wonderful picture with a great message.
I don't know how accurate this is, so take it with a grain of salt (some are almost certainly bogus).  But it's to show that the below estimate may not only be possible, but may be very low.  http://www.mercuryexposure.org/index.php?page_id=29   
&gt; With Digg, you get the freshest shit possible; with Reddit, the cream floats to the top. Yeah, but reddit's "top" algorithm has the unfortunate side-effect of promoting troll posts that get lots of highly-scored replies. One idiot posts "you suck!" so 20 people feel compelled to explain why they don't suck and then they get modded up for it. Net result? The top post is some idiot posting "you suck!" and 20 worthless off-topic responses. (Edit: This is also why I'd like to be able to collapse a thread.)
This dude is a major league NeoCon wack-a-doo. Check the rest of the paragraph that the headline starts: &gt;"If it is up to me, we are going to explain that an attack on this homeland of that nature would be followed by **an attack on the holy sites in Mecca and Medina**," the GOP presidential candidate said. "That **is the only thing I can think of that might deter somebody from doing what they would otherwise do.** If I am wrong fine, tell me, and I would be happy to do something else. But you had better find a deterrent or you will find an attack. **There is no other way around it. There have to be negative consequences for the actions they take. That's the most negative I can think of."** Blowing up major religious sites is the best deterrent this guy can come up with. Joe Lieberman had to change his tighty-whiteys after hearing that speech. But for those of us who are interested in *America's* well-being, is midget-minded balls-talking Colorado Congressman Tom Tancredo *really* the kind of leader we're going to need in 2008? Who'd have thought that after six years of worldwide NeoCon Hell, we'd have a presidential candidate falling all over himself to make sure everyone knows that he plans to out-do Team Bush-Cheney-Rove in fear-mongering, magnifying the terrorist threat beyond all rationality, misleading the public, and, if allowed, launching ridiculously wasteful and pointless wars that will only serve to kill yet another generation of American kids while simultaneously expanding terrorism worldwide? Think America will bite?
Aunt Jemima pancake syrup.
I don't understand.  First you say neo-atheist behave one way, then you say they rhetorically speak this way, and then you say they don't act this way, then you say a neo-atheist does indeed act this way.  In other words, wtf are you talking about?   And no, I don't think fundamentalists are well-represented in all professional fields.  Sunday church-goers... sure, but they certainly aren't dogmatic to the point it becomes a problem to work together.
&gt;I have read work that they are convinced that light is a particle. ...from the 19th century. &gt;Assuming that is correct, when will it become a singularity and disappear from sight? At what speed? Does not light travel... at the speed of light?!...Would this not make light particles a singularity on the leading side of the star? Why are we not plunged into darkness for a month or so every year? Are you going to tell me that singularities only work in other hypothetical situations? Maybe matter is only relative to itself? Maybe you claim that light is whatever you make it to fit your flakey math models? It's almost saddening that you'll never know just how close and how far from the truth you are right at this moment. &gt;Do not worry, not one of your colleagues will notice that you will claim to me that light is ONLY a wave today, but next week you will treat light as a particle. Maybe light is both and neither. Bwaaaahahahaha If this was any less sincere, I'd be tempted to call it a parody. It's like you stumbled upon relativity by accident. It's like Poincaré, but without the... brains.
A lot of this seems focused on the sexual behaviour of highschool students. One thing I noticed is that the earlier you bloomed in school, the lower your value. So in middle school, the kids experimenting with sex were dropping out by highschool. And in highschool the ones getting a lot did not go as far post highschool. Delaying your reproduction is something the wealthy tend to do as well, and another study I saw illustrated how poor people had more sex then the wealthy, but the wealthy had more of the sort of side dishes (like making out) that aren't quite sex.
They used to be a free forum and very helpful. Apparently they "monetized" their several years of archives. Moral: Don't contribute to a forum you don't trust.
No money? Get the hell out of here asshole!
Very nice, actually.  From the intro it sounds like this guy would love haskell.  Or perhaps hate it, because it solves all the things he's been thinking about for the last "30 years". This is the best guide I've ever seen for the reasonable use of C++'s advanced features/idioms, though.
&gt;smart folk need to spend more time in the gym Yep. Everyone who meets me online assumes I must be absolutely pencil-necked, and everyone who meets me in person starts carefully avoiding words with more than two syllables. Irritating.
Perhaps the public cameras are wrong, but they not Orwellian. Big Brother invaded the home and knew the individual presently, not just retroactively. The problems will start when the police try to process license plates, faces, etc, and mine the collected data.
Beats me. As I've stated, I don't have the answer. Do you?
Whether it's a rendering or not, pictures like that always... uh... bring me down to earth and remind me of my place, such as it is.
I think your proved his point, if that's the only alternative you can think of.
Couldn't get to the freaking point in the first few paragraphs ... buh-bye.
Atheism is still faith according to your definition or oxford's. Strictly speaking, atheism is the acceptance of the belief of the non-existence of God "without or inspite of the evidence" it is also, especially on this site, a firm belief without logical proof. You are smart enough to know that science doesn't provide proof for the non-existence of God. Therefore atheists "believe" on "faith" that there is no God.
And it allows more people to go to the movies, so everyone is happy. Similarly, this allows English speakers to visit the museum without having to read Russian. It's discrimination, but it isn't predatory unless they lie to you (i.e., "don't go that way, they won't sell you a ticket").
How precisely are you going to design a "recall" system that allows an entire district to fire their representative on a moments notice? The CA state governor recall was 10 month process from the time the petition drive was announced to the time Davis was tossed from office. And when you unelect them who do you replace them with?
I think my favorite is still "Silence Of The Lambs".
What do you mean, 'losing property value'? I call that 'saving on bloated property taxes'. There are only two reasons your property value matters... when you pay property taxes, and when you want to sell. If you bought your home planning to sell it later as an investment, then you should have made sure the price you paid was reasonable. Buying tulip stocks when they're sky high is stupid, as was buying a house when their cost was so far above their value. You made a bad investment, and now you'll have to live in it... but is that so bad? You HAVE A HOME. Good for you! Keep it! It could be valued at one dollar for all that it matters... that doesn't make the home any less valuable to the family that lives in it.
&gt; The New York Times is a daily newspaper published in New York City by Arthur Ochs Sulzberger Jr. and distributed internationally. It is owned by The New York Times Company, which publishes 15 other newspapers, including the International Herald Tribune and The Boston Globe. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_York_Times
Isn't my letter to Home Depot telling them I don't like who they are advertising with and would be less likely to shop at their store if they did advertise with said person me exercising my own right to free speech? I can speak just as loudly with my pocket book as I can with my mouth.
We could join in and see how they like floating islands of assorted garbage.  Better yet, divert toxic waste from Swan Hills Alberta and cash in!  Hey if the lakes are going to be ruined anyway we may as well profit from it too.
Nothing
Apparently other street performers have set the bar extremely low.
42
There is actually a reason to have an electoral college.  Do you honestly believe our founding fathers were stupid?  The college is part of the same checks and balances that balances the house of representitives where congressmen are proportioned by population and the senate where congressmen are a fixed 2 per state so rhode Island has exactly as many senators as California.    You have only to look at Reddit or Digg to understand the tyranny of the majority.  dissent is silenced, stifled and strangled.  And if you actually take off your partisan blinders and read the article you'll see that California smothers the electorial wishes of ~40% of its population -- think about that -- the 60% majority in California silences the 40%, really, effectively stealing their votes. Of course on a nation-wide level even though california games their electorial college (and it's ok because it's not YOUR wishes being stifled I guess) the college still makes sure that the entire political process isn't hijacked by the most populous states.  It keeps people in the smaller states engaged in the national debate and dialog and thus keeps everyone in the union engaged.  Anyway, just because the system occasionally burps in a way you don't like doesn't mean it's broken.  Some of the greatest minds that ever lived helped shape our system -- nobody should ever forget that. 
You're so [right](http://web.amnesty.org/pages/ttt4-article_3-eng)
hi. if anyones reading thi plz visit ma site n comment thankyou oh an sub tht wud be reli appreciated
Litepost has none of these.
The only people who support Bush are the hardcore fundamentalists. They'll believe whatever Bush says. They're the O'reilly's of the world. They want all of us anti-war protesters in FEMA camps, they want to turn Iran into a "parking lot", and Iraq into "glass". Nevermind that the ones who supposedly perpetrated 9/11 came from Saudi Arabia, Osama is dead, that Bush is funding al-Qaeda, that our military are killing more civilians there than "terrorists", that Halliburton and Bechtel and the other military contractors stole hundreds of billions, that we're creating more terrorists, that our borders are wide open and our border patrols are sent to jail and beaten when they do protect the borders....the list goes on.
&gt; I wish I could mod you up twice. Gerrymandering = clearly worse than the current winner-takes-all of a state's votes.  &gt; National popular vote winner = probably better. It is better to have the voters of the 49 other states decide how to allocate CA's electoral votes? Ugh!
I actually saved money when I had a WoW subscription, $15 a month for unlimited entertainment.
The sinking of the Titanic is an abomination? Methinks Mr. Samsonite is not familiar with the meaning of this word.
The guy in the photo is Tim Ferris.  It's unlikely that tim would choose steroids over his sheer willpower and confidence in changing parts of his life. Tim is a popular author, entrepenuer, cage-fighter, kickboxing champ, speaks half a dozen languagues (unusual for an american).  He's a very smart man.  And (relevant to this thread) he has applied his sheer geekiness to his love life.  He once outsourced his dating.  He got teams of geeks to compete in order to get him dates.
It's not a dodge... atheism has nothing to do and nothing to say about the origin of man... that has nothing to do with the question of "is there a god(s) or not?" It seems religious people can't see that as two different topics. Not really the best logic there.
Sorry invictus, although I'm not married, if my wife came to me and claimed that Jesus lived in her heart, I would need some sort of justification to believe her. Although I may trust most of what she says, the more outlandish the claims(using the dragon example), the greater the burden of proof. In fact claiming God is more outlandish than claiming a dragon. She would need to explain to me why she believe what she claims. She would have to justify this belief. She could either be telling the truth, be deceived, is deceiving or mistaken. Unless she makes a good case, knowing what I know about her she be more likely to be deceived or mistaken as opposed to telling the truth.
Yes, but this was a political protest, not a call for distress.  Again, those cops were just looking to kick some ass for political reasons.
Acid's got nothing on DMT for "magical fairy land" experiences.
Because so many laissez faire capitalists go around chanting "Bombs not bread" and "Kill kill kill".  CPops' comment has already summed up my opinion pefectly, so I won't bother repeating it, but I'm pretty sure these people don't really understand what exactly they're protesting against.
I never said anything about being: &gt;defined primarily by your struggle with debt... I only meant that it can and does have a major effect on many people's lives and to act like it doesn't is not only naive but downright stupid.
Regarding advanced physics \*I\* reached the limits of my understanding \*YEARS\* ago -- I think it's awesome that there are people who understand so much more than I do and can have at least a partial model of "reality" in their heads. Poor boybunny :(
It probably broke for a reason, but being an Apple user who doesn't have time to understand why, you chose to throw it away and buy an iPod instead.  Atypical.
&gt;In other words, wtf are you talking about? I'm not clear on what's confusing you. &gt;And no, I don't think fundamentalists are well-represented in all professional fields. I don't know whether or not they are, but that's not the point.  Neo-atheism does not regard only fundamentalists as enemies.  In fact, neo-atheism finds making distinctions between fundamentalists and the other religionists dangerous.
I like that answer. That makes as much sense as 'God did it"
I think the country needs to worry less about symbolism and more about how our rights are eroding.
&gt; In fact, a store only taking cash is a store operating with LOWER overhead, since credit cards and checks cost them extra money to process. And lower overhead often means lower prices. I see this in sharp relief at gas stations. Many of them now have separate price-boards for credit and cash. You can save roughly a dime per gallon (which, in the big SUVs, is enough for another gallon) by leaving the plastic in your pocket.
If you guys are still here tomorrow, I'll post more but I gotta go, my parents are coming home and I haven't gotten any work done....fun talking to you Imperium and Spaceparanoid
What I'm saying is that you are jumping to the conclusion that he is a neo-atheism. In fact, rgladstein clarified himself more in another comment. See how he isn't shunning religious people. It's not the same to be against "furthering the aims of a church" than saying Religion is naturally a wicked thing.
sounds like your wife got into my stash.
Great Dragons, I'm *NEVER* getting laid...
Still looks free to me: http://www.experts-exchange.com/registerFree2.jsp 
&gt; If every state in the union adopted this policy, then we would have a genuine direct election. No you would not. Remember each states electoral votes are the sum of the number of House seats and the two Senate seats. And each state us guaranteed a minimum of one House seat regardless how few people it has. Thus smaller states would have a disproportionate number of electoral votes. Thus it is not a direct election.
(Personally I'm still not convinced s/he's not yanking our chain, 'cuz come \*on\*... if \*I\* think someone is talking out their ass it must be so obvious as to be fake :D
Surely not.  [Google code search for RequestProcessorFactoryFactory](http://www.google.com/codesearch?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;q=RequestProcessorFactoryFactory&amp;sbtn=Search)
His German is a bit whimsical as well...
LoL. So the muslims attacked the Philippine army because they knew the US would eventually give the army guns? What?   
[Be the bot](http://bethebot.com/).
Poor predictable schizobullet. Edit: ...it's a Simpsons reference!
1. Is a "tyranny of the majority" inherently unfair?  2. If so, would eliminating the electoral college result in one?  3. Finally, is granting minorities additional influence the best way to prevent a tyranny of the majority? These are all difficult questions, but the answers are moot, because politics would dominate any sort of debate.  Remember that the electoral college, along with the bicameral congress, was itself a compromise.  Nobody ever liked the idea, but it had the supreme virtue of being politically realistic, and that's all that mattered in the end.
That's the only smart observation you've made all day. What makes you think it exists?
Why stop there? If any Christians get out of line, nuke the Vatican! And if the Jews get rebellious, destroy the Temple of Solomon! Oh wait...
There should be no margin of error in elections?  This is 2007 for shit sake if we can't have every vote counted and counted correctly we are seriously fucking things up. I think we should just do away with the electoral college and have direct popular vote elections.  I don't see any problem with this at all.
Xah Lee is not illiterate. Under-medicated?  Yes.  But he can read and write.
So, what about Christian Conservatives who boycott programs they disagree with? Before you spout off that Christians wouldn't do that, [think again](http://www.christianboycott.org/).  They urge readers to, because of *DaVinci Code*, "**Abuse SONY Corporation for abusing Christianity**" and avoid seeing *DaVinci Code* because "Every dollar you spend on it simply makes you poorer (in your wallet and spirit) and encourages “them” to make hundreds other ones just like it designed to attack and abuse your most cherished beliefs." Do you agree with their tactic?  Is it denying Sony or Dan Brown the right to write his books or market their movies?
Generally I just keep scrolling past all the hidden stuff.  They normally have the real stuff some 10 screens down.
Oh yeah, THAT'LL help improve US international relations. Where'd this asshat take lessons in diplomacy, the KKK rallies?
&gt;I'm still not convinced s/he's not yanking our chain Read their comment history. It's really kind of tragic :(
&gt;What I'm saying is that you are jumping to the conclusion that he is a neo-atheism. I didn't.  To make that clear, I said "rgladstein's position has the flavor of neo-atheism."
Funny, in 2004 I said a similar thing when the Democrats (from California no less) tried to change Colorado's electoral vote allocation to a percentage of state wide popular vote. Only I said, "until California implements it, it is just Democrat manipulation of the vote for their own fiendish purposes". Democrats thought of it first; Republicans are merely retaliating (on a state with one of the worst public school systems, so it might actually work this time on the rubes casting votes).
The Democrats tried this in Colorado too.  It was wrong then, and it's wrong now.  Destroying the integrity of the electoral college for short-term political gain is truly stupid.
&gt; "Anyone driving faster than me is a maniac! Anyone driving slower than me is an idiot!" - George Carlin
Bio: 29 /   Real: 16.6 /   Avg Life Expectancy: 74 /   Life Expectancy: 86.4
He doesn't say that they are broken, but that they are fundamentally flawed in the case that they track files specially.  There's a difference :P Linus certainly brings up very good points in this, though.
Meh, Tancredo knows he doesn't have a shot at the nomination anyway.  Now, if Romney or someone said this...I mean, said it in a public forum...Now, THAT would be interesting.
I guess where that hits Main Street America in the gut is when their kids are coming back from Iraq with serious brain damage, missing arms and legs, and with their faces burned off.  Funny, that kind of bad news propagates fast, if for no other reason than families talk to one another.  I think it overrules whatever else people might have thought up until then, because there's no victory or even near-victory that the family of a wounded or killed soldier can point to and say, "I suppose it was worth it, then." And America's people -- they're slow sometimes, but they're *not* stupid. I think they're smart enough not to buy this kind of talk. Or I hope they are, anyway.
That's nothing. I got 1 million outta 20, hit Finish three times, got my own personal "Thank you" message, was paid, and am addicted to coffee, beer, porn, cocaine, heroin and pure crack.
All your friends are on it so you better be on it. It reminds me of email (awesome), IRC (cool) and MSN (dumbed down IRC). So, in conclusion, Facebook is the worst abomination to hit the western civilization since the sinking of the Titanic, - if the Titanic sank with Albert Einstein and all of Brad Pitt's grandparents on it, that is - the black plague and WWI combined. Pleasant Facebooking.
there was an anti-coke commercial once:  "i work more overtime so i can buy more coke so i can work more overtime...."  having been there, i almost fell out of my chair laughing.
This should be the anti-drug message for everyone!  Perfectly said.
"I think therefore I am" Anyway, the multiverse theory is still just a hypothesis that hasn't been proven and when you look at it, the foundation of the universe, the basic natural physical laws that govern that complexity is elegant and not as complex as you make it out to be.  Now how those laws function and what they are is the interesting bits. PS:I've yet to read The God Delusion yet although I've read his past books. Didn't much like Harris' book.
Hah.  That brings up one of the main issues with git - it isn't well supported on windows.
That's the dumbest thing I've ever heard!
&gt;Ketamine is fine though, they used it for decades and still use it in some circumstances as anesthesia for children. WTF?  Proof, please.  And let it not be from a 3rd world country. K is ridiculously easy to OD on.  I've seen people who have used drugs regularly for 20+ years take a single bump and hit a k hole big enough to nearly make them stop breathing.
Just get UserAgent for firefox and pretend your browser is a googlebot. After I realized that, I finally checked the Exchange and found that the information is not worth the price at all.
No liberal will ever claim "all" troops are against the war.  Last poll I saw had the armed forces around 60% anti-war. Nice strawman, though.
I slept with my wife.
The pig was an ex-soldier who had just gotten back.
I don't.
How could you guys finish that thing?  I feel dizzy.
ALL BEHOLD JELLO MOLD JESUS!
Like traffic fines in Finland.
you@wannaknow.com is getting my spice girls updates for me. Thanks, you!
Because what school you go to is not randomly assigned. schools typically contain clusters of people who live in the same area and generally they have similar socio-economic status, which has been shown to correlate with intelligence test scores. Also, some populations are self-selected, in the case of religious or private schools, where everyone is more or less the same.
I CAN HAS RABITBURGR? NOOOO! THEY BE STEALIN MAH McBUNIES!
stupid hilarious
We need to get control of our government, not rely on the goodwill of corporate persons to protect our freedoms.
Interesting, I never thought of obesity as a disease.
I like Tek-Tips. Also like Thescripts.com (though they're hit or miss, they're at least trying) and the usenet groups via Google. And then there's lots of independent contractors who do both--provide educational websites and script or DB tutorials and also get clients that way and charge them. That seems organic to me, and reflects a certain integrity. Allen Browne (I probably spelled at least one of his names wrong) does a lot of that with Access. It's very helpful and my sense is that his own business does nicely while at the same time being generous with his own knowledge.  That's what comes with not being a scaredy pants--that other people will steal your wee bit of knowledge and run you out of business with the staggering power that comes with how to run a subquery.
Let's say a blogger will be going away for a few days and won't have internet connection to check on the comments posted by visitors. It's better to temporarily disable the comments to prevent spammers from flooding the comment box with all sorts of useless links. Here's how to temporarily disable the comment form on all posts.
I have a loose theory on this that isn't covered in the article. This comes from my experience. Guys who are significantly smarter (or outright geeky or whatever) tend to have a mixture of things that work against them. Guys who work out tend to be a lot more in touch with their bodies. On thing is this: Being very comfortable in the realm of abstract ideas at the cost of being in touch with their bodies. Another thing is this:  Geeky guys ( and I use the term geek with respect) tend to try to "outsmart" the problems of their love lives, unable to accept that the way human courtship works is outside of the bounds of the logic that they know.  (I had that one real bad. Now I often see it in my geeky friends)   
even if just a quarter of this were true it's really disgusting bush/cheney inc.©™ will run in 08  i mean, who's gonna stop them  the law hasn't touched them yet...
Tillman makes plans to meet with a linguist. The White House finds out about it!!!! Cheney orders Tillman's assassination. Wow, this is a totally plausible series of events! Next week on Tin Hats With Mcwifi: when John F. Kennedy secretly arranges a meeting with Bob Dylan, his long-time critic, fervent evangelist comedian Bob Hope, plots his death... with MAGIC!
I am not a lawyer.  This is not legal advice. I seem to remember a famous ruling back in the 1980s that said languages could not be copyrighted.  I seem to remember it being related to Postscript or Lotus 1-2-3, but I'm not sure. If my memory is correct (and it may not be), then I would expect that producing alternative implementations of a machine language would be protected. I am not a lawyer.  This is not legal advice.
This is very common.  I have seen a variant of this everywhere I have traveled.  I have no problem with it, as tourists that don't know the local language (or at least the numbers) in France, Germany, and China effectively subsidizes my cheaper fare. My mother wanted to buy a map (one map printed in multiple languages) in Paris.  The guy was hawking in French and English.  He approached her and said "Map for you, 5 euro."  She said in French "I am an American, but I would like the French price, please."  He didn't bat an eye and charged her 1 euro.
which is spelled stoopid.
Ah ... sounds familiar. http://www.wired.com/entertainment/music/commentary/listeningpost/2006/11/72105
&gt; Freedom of the press is not the kind of speech that is at issue. In the cited case, a corporation was granted the right to free speech to influence legislation. It should be obvious why this is a very bad thing - the tremendous amounts of capital available to them gives corporations far greater access and influence to legislators, allowing them to shape legislation in ways contrary to the public good. No, it's not obvious at all to me.  Furthermore, I purposely included Public Citizen, which does lobbying work.  And if the rights of corporations can be arbitrarily abridged, as you seem to be arguing, why should there be Freedom of the Press for the New York Times. &gt; The tobacco corporations were using their size and power to undermine the free market. They thwarted the government's attempt to exercise its duty under the Sherman Anti-Trust Act to correct this grave threat to the very essence of capitalism. Imagine what would happen if corporations could use the Fourth Amendment to subvert the USDA or OSHA. Corporations have done exactly this. This is exactly why a "corporate person" must have less rights than its real human owners. I don't understand at all.  USDA and OSHA regulations apply equally to corporations and sole proprietorships.  The Fourth Amendment applies equally, too.  It seems to work okay. I'm not sure what point you're trying to make about tobacco companies.  American Tobacco Company was broken up under the Sherman Antitrust Act, but I'm guessing you have something else in mind.  What is the connection between tobacco companies' acts and corporate personhood? &gt; You can't compare sole proprietorships/partnerships and corporations. One operates under a state charter and the other does not. The state confers limited liability on the corporation to allow it to build huge amounts of capital and thus engaging in projects to ultimately affect the public good. However, the huge amounts of capital available to corporations allows them tremendous amounts of influence that a sole proprietor could never hope to have. Thus, the government must limit corporate rights, to contain the possible damage. This is how things were before certain corporations perverted the true purpose of the 14th Amendment, starting with SANTA CLARA COUNTY v. SOUTHERN PAC. R. CO., 118 U.S. 394. So you're arguing that the fact that corporations may be large--of course many aren't--means that the owners should not be compensated when property is taken?  Please explain. 
Ah so it's the "intelligent people like us" who waste their lives on these crackpot theories, is it? Funny I had rather a different opinion of such people.
Call your congressional representatives and demand US troop redeployment now!
The title isn't "beauties with brains" it's BIG brains. My friends girlfriend placed top 10 in miss world Canada and is taking Honors math at the University of Waterloo (top math school in Canada). I'm more impressed with that then learning multiple languages.
The program itself should be sufficient: \techo showpage | eurionize &gt; eurion.ps (Note: Untested.)
Then leave the key in the lock, slightly turned. You can't unlock the door from the other side and you can't push the key out either. Bingo.
physicians' desk reference, or PDR
I scored 100 :( 
Davis CA? Aren't they all for bikes on the campus? I don't remember any car roundabouts.
Ooh. I'm hurt. Owie.   What are you, twelve?
You know, I thought this was weird and obsessive when the Mac users did it. I don't know why anyone would imitate them.
"Enuf said'... In clear words it is BS" If you want precise figures, go to any supermarket and look at the price/unit of any commodity (sugar, corn oil, starch, copper, whatever). Then look at the spot market price. Then compare the two. I already gave you one example. ""Grid loss is approx 1/3. For a given technology (fuel, solar, wind...) are huge powerplants (or 'farms') 1/3 more efficient than small ones? I doubt so."" Yes, exactly- we were comparing huge, centralized powerplants against small, local ones.
lucky man, no canada jokes here.
there was a radio station in austin in the early '70's, whose dj would say, "it's 3am, do you know where you're at?"
So what you're saying is: being the smartest kid at a poor school is like being the skinniest kid at fat camp?
It's the Jon Stewart question mark.
To those who have not yet seen evidence of this fact: check out the analysis of the Eurion linked from The Article, as well as Kuhn's tutorials on [ISO paper sizes](http://www.cl.cam.ac.uk/~mgk25/iso-paper.html) (A4, etc.) and [ISO 8601 date and time formats](http://www.cl.cam.ac.uk/~mgk25/iso-time.html).
Are you sure we **want** to know? The detailed news coverage of how Kenneth Pinyan in 2005 died after having his Arab stallion .... him in the ... did not make an enjoyable read either. Even today, some sexual desires are best left unmentioned.
troll
I thought this was what the Democrats wanted? Straight Democracy instead of winner-takes-all?
With European accents and batshit crazy Internet personalities, of course. Railsssssssss!
Isn't that what this does?
&gt;The Prime Minister's Office, which views the pipeline to Haifa as a "bonus" the U.S. could give to Israel in return for its unequivocal support for the American-led campaign in Iraq, had asked the Americans for the official telegram. NeoCon SCUM. Israel's unequivocal support for the American-led campaign in Iraq?  *The American-led campaign in Iraq has served Israel's interests primarily since its inception.* Hussein gone and a long-term (some say decades) American commitment to Iraq is *more* than enough of a gift to Israel. But it's never quite enough, is it? "3,500 of our soldiers are dead, Israel, is it enough?" **"What ELSE can you do for me?"** "Wait, wait -- two hundred and fifty million dollars a minute spent to keep the war going, is that enough now?" **"How about some oil?"** "Sure, we can deliver you a few thousand barrels of oil." **"You're not thinking clearly, Cheney. *A few thousand barrels?* Are you serious?"** "No, no, you're right. We'll build a pipeline from Iraq to Israel. That way you'll have your own source of oil into perpetuity." **"Good Cheney. Goooooooood Dick Cheney."**   The NeoCon Menace Continues. Is America even remotely aware of how thoroughly screwed we are?
The obvious solution is to move old people into a prison camp.
yeah, but how do you make one of those?
rollinginfeces, how can you refer to bill's drivel as free speech? How can you compare O'whatbullshit to Olberman, who is  civil, logical, and a human being?
We all owe thanks to Ben Affleck!
Q: i had lots more sex last year. what happened, did i get smarter this year?  A: probably not, loser shit...
[Positive liberty](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Positive_liberty) is not liberty at all. I would think you, as a conservative, would support this.
Well, you contradicting yourself is what is confusing me.   BTW, I can't even find neo-atheism on wikipedia so at this point I kinda feel like you are making shit up.  Good luck in your quest to label atheists as big meanies.
You mean the one on Portal, right?  Yeah, I've always wondered why it is there too.  I think the roads department had too much money or something.
Definitely photoshopped. You can tell by the lack of Echo the dolphin.
"Hitler had to deal with the Jews blowing up shit somehow. Those beheadings were getting out of hand." i have no idea what you are talking about.
I never met rollingdiversion in person, but I know he has brown eyes only because he is so fulla shit. Goebbels would be proud, my ass.
When you say that polygamy is a consensual act, you assume that men and women in a society that practices polygamy have equal rights, or that the women have the right to refuse. Do you really think that is true in Islam?
In part, yes. It's a well-established result in psychology that the more intelligent you are, the more capable you are at coming up with rationalizations for a given choice, action, or observation (this is easy to test - force a group of people to individually and randomly engage in one of the foregoing; later ask them their reasons for choosing what they did. Remembering that there could be no reason since it was forced on them and random, intelligence correlates with more reasons and more complex reasons). Unfortunately, this also makes it easier to engage in self-deception. Or to put it another way, stupid people can't come up with good conspiracy theories. I really can't imagine such a person reading _Foucault's Pendulum_ and enjoying it.
"two englishmen"
It is the same as drug addicts puffing their opium pipes ranting at those who abstain.  The vociferous comments from meat eaters are the desperate cries of their dying spirits caught in the cycle of suffering and addiction which their own minds are incapable of truly grasping.  Very sad.
Because Google needs to advertise.
OJ Simpson is back to giving interviews again — and this time it’s live on the Internet. Contain your enthusiasm. MN1.com’s Kim Delaney spent an hour talking with OJ today.
Nope, just that Christian rock is dreadful music. It's simply awful: pop-machine regurgitations in a slightly different--but still bland--flavor. Christian rock bands can get away with tasteless pap because it contains key words and phrases such as "the cross" and "salvation" and whatnot. I can't speak for everyone here, but I personally have nothing against Christians--it's just this soulless crap that I can't stand. Fans of Christian rock really have no taste, because they could be listening to better music, even if they only listened to Christian music.
Please repeat for me, point by point but in your own words,  what the issues stated are with FULL OUTER JOINS, and then please point out which of those issues are MS-SQL specific and give an example of how any other **ANSI** SQL implementation differs.    Also, please also point out any parts of the article that are MS-SQL specific as well; the test scripts were obviously done in MS-SQL, but that was just some performance testing, and performance is only a small portion of the article.  The majority of the article focuses on handling NULLS, avoiding duplicates, and writing clean, accurate and clear SQL statements, as I am sure you are aware since I am sure you read it very carefully. Finally, please feel free to post your own performance comparison script(s) using the database engine of your choice to demonstrate any of your points.  If you can try posting some facts, just this one time (come on! try it!) I'll be happy to discuss. I am definitely willing to learn from you. Thanks in advance! We can turn it into a nice article that compares SQL implementations and performance between SQL Server and other DB engines, and perhaps we can even conclusively prove that "SQL Server is lame"!  I will give you a fair shake at it, you have my word, just use some facts.  This is your big chance!  Prove those SQL Server fan boys wrong!
Don't you know how to bypass the Registration screen? You just ☒☒☒☒☒☒☒, ☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒. ☒☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒; ☒ ☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒☒☒☒ ☒☒☒. *To view the rest of this comment, send me five bucks.*
if you register can you access?
You would get hauled in for murder because most people cannot survive with their skin off.
Yes he started in Afghanistan and supported that.  Then when they went to Iraq he has been quoted as saying "this war is so fucking illegal" and it maybe became clear to him.  However he died in Afghanistan and was transferred back there.  From what I gather Tillman spoke his mind loudly.  Fragicide is a problem in war, if a person is considered a threat the general may be ordered to take him out, I would say the probability is with this. When in the military, if you don't agree, usually you suppress that until you are out and can gather more info. Soldiers are programmed and rarely have the full news to get a full picture of what is happening. Not sure that freedom of speech works the same way when at war. The problem is the whole War on Terror is false and when it came down, it affects people differently.  If you still believe it to be true, in the words of Hunter S. Thompson,  "No point in mentioning the bats, I thought. Poor bastard will see them soon enough". &gt;“I can see it like a movie screen,” Baer said. “We were outside of (a city in southern Iraq) watching as bombs were dropping on the town. We were at an old air base, me, Kevin and Pat, we weren’t in the fight right then. We were talking. And Pat said, ‘You know, this war is so f— illegal.’ And we all said, ‘Yeah.’ That’s who he was. He totally was against Bush.”  http://sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/c/a/2005/09/25/MNGD7ETMNM1.DTL&amp;type=printable
Hmmm, I wonder if the people of Zim can count with so many zeros involved.
The Dick Who Cried Wolf.
Youtube are the people ..  and the GOP are out of touch.
What I really like about the Adams answer is it is just a pure kernel of arbitrariness.   I feel like all of natural science is reducing the amount of arbitrariness.  For example, we started with cataloging the tremendous number of substances on earth, each of them having their own quirky properties for no obvious reason.  Then we realized they were composed of an astonishingly small number of different kinds of atoms, and, more importantly, realized how the seemingly endless arbitrary properties of all the different molecules was based on this set of atoms.  Then we discovered the nucleons, and how the properties of a hundred or so atoms really depended on logical arrangements of just three kinds of particles.   Physicists strive to show how the laws of nature are not disjoint and arbitrary, but connected on a deeper level; Maxwell's equations and Newton's laws are not just some random rules governing life on Earth, but were found to be a logical consequence of the unified system called general relativity.  Current efforts are towards showing how the four fundamental forces of nature aren't just four random rules, but follow logically from some grand unified theory.   But in the end, I can only imagine we're going to be left with something completely arbitrary, like "42."
Are not men also psychologically strained by divorce? Or by the circumstances that lead to the divorce?
I believe that the judge on The Wall is, literally, a talking ass.
oops I misspelled Baghdad as "Bahgdad"
I'm having difficulty in seeing how your points relate to the (implied) conclusion in your final paragraph - stop me if I end up at a tangent. You seem to be claiming that lots of people sending unDRM'd music around is proof that people have taken a conscious decision not to purchase DRM's music.   I see this as a simple consequence of the easiest way to get music, and not involving any conscious decision about DRM.  I will note that, for example, certain songs have topped the singles chart, when available in DRM'd download only formats - which indicates that it is _not_ a deliberate rejection of DRM. It is only when people have been negativly affected by DRM that they are forced to weigh up the pros and cons (i.e. does the negative to me outweigh the positive) seriously.  Some people may well decide that it is worth it [0], others will choose to reject it. I cannot see how hiding the EURion, and covering up software to add it to everything will cause more people to consider DRM and related systems. [0] And I suspect most of those will not have a full understanding of how encryption based DRM works; but that's as may be. 
The idea is that the electoral college would become quaint and be ignored as a formality. The winner could only reasonably claim to have won 54% of the vote. When the Soviet Union held elections, there was only one candidate on the ballot.
Ahhhh actually, he does use the word "broken".  Although I don't disagree with you.
Die for oil sucker  SUCKER  SUCKER!
lol
"Holy fing fuckypants?"
Yea, I mean, I'd totally hit it. I was just sayin'.
Buy both.  Use them on each other.
Provide me something I actually have reasonably easy access to. *edit* Actually, here ya go: http://www.drugs.com/pro/ketamine.html &gt;Pediatric Use &gt;Safety and effectiveness in pediatric patients below the age of 16 have not been established. 
No comments on this story?  One of the "Zionist-neocon" hostages is an American sociologist from a group funded by *George Soros*. 
Good for Home Depot. They've got a spine after all.
And Wierd Al's Parents are dead
Um, the winner of the popular vote would always get 535 electoral votes and the loser would always get 0. How is that not equivalent to a direct election?
Not sure if you can write a daemon in LaTeX or HTML. But then I have only average HTML knowledge.
I'm sorry, my statement was poorly worded.  I agree that natural selection no longer plays a role in human evolution.  What I meant is that biological immortality, which naturally will be made available to the wealthy elite first, will have the effect of further prolonging the longevity of outmoded thought patterns, and by extension the institutions they give rise to and perpetuate, regardless of the harm they cause.   I think most people suffer from fanaticism to some degree, though the ideologies for which they have forsaken reason vary from one culture to the next.  Throughout history, the chief enabling factor for cultural change has been the simple fact that everyone dies, and with them, the irrational thought patterns they cling to.  The "old fossils" and stubborn fools, who populate every strata of humanity, are the "idiots" I refer to.  What happens if they live for several centuries?   Have you ever tried to get an old person to change their established routine in the smallest possible way?  How much more difficult is it to challenge their most deeply held beliefs?
Yes, yes you would. The winner of the nationwide popular vote would win the election.
You are right about the retarded part.Oh, Wait.. who were you refering to again?
no, he is teh guy who played Saudi guy working at Initech in Office Space (1997)
I pledge allegiance to the Flag... with Liberty and Justice for All.
If you're having "maybe a beer with a meal", does that really even count as being an alcoholic? I have never bought that "once an alcoholic, always an alcoholic" thing.  Your relationship with alcohol can change.  You can grow and mature as a person.  I think that to tell yourself "I can never touch alcohol again" is giving it just as much power over you as it had when you were drinking out of control.  Because you stay scared of it, always thinking "if I ever slip even just a little bit I'll be right back where I was..."  You're just setting yourself up for failure by telling yourself that.
This is neither fiendish *nor* retailitory.  This is called politics.  Both sides will use every available maneuver possible to win.  Period. I made similar comments about the [filibuster situation](http://reddit.com/info/27ghj/comments/c27lf5).  Back when the Dem's were filibustering, it was hailed as an heroic fight to preserve the constitution.  Then when the GOP filibustered minimum-wage increase (or whatever) they were "obstructionist".  Again, neither descriptions of filibusters are correct. Filibusters, the electoral college, executive orders, etc:  These are the rules of the game.  Think the rules could be improved?  Fine.  But please don't believe that one party obeys some sort of gentlemanly rules while the other party is nefarious.
&gt;you contradicting yourself That doesn't clear anything up, because it isn't specific. &gt;I can't even find neo-atheism on wikipedia On Wikipedia "New atheism" redirects to "Antitheism."  The term "neoatheism" is less common than "new atheism," but seems less awkward to me. &gt;Good luck in your quest to label atheists as big meanies. They aren't.  That's the point.  Not all atheists are neo-atheists.
&gt; We were never meant to be a Democracy. Well, *I* never got to vote on the matter...
[Context](http://www.beyondtv.org/nato/crap/craps.htm).  It's like the "Billionaires for Bush" thing from a couple of years ago-the idea is called street theater, a type of protest that incorporates things like irony, satire and humor--concepts that apparently fly right over the heads of some libertarian fanboys here. *Fuck 'em if they can't take a joke.*
The Bird of Prey looks awesome! But doesnt compare to DS9 CGI/ models.  Great job for a fan-film!
Wholesale pearl wedding jewelry,Swarovski crystal wedding necklace,white freshwater pearl bridal wedding jewelry,wedding jewelry sets at www.topearl.com.
If he's that strapped for cash, maybe he should get rid of his cable service. Bonus -- No more 'My Super Sweet 16.   
Funny, I ran into this site for the first time a few hours ago.  I was looking for a way to permanently delete Netmeeting and Outlook.  I was frustrated when I saw the cloaked answers.  I wasn't aware it was blatantly against Googles rules.
"...where some populations (e.g. blacks) have average IQs (88 versus 100) that are considered borderline retarded..." are you serious? do you really claim this that easily while leaving every possible socio-economic (pre)condition out of your calcul?  seriously, why on earth is this guy upmodded with 3 points (at the time i am typing)?! "Not everyone recognizes "international law". America certainly doesn't" hey dude, i was talking about civilized nations who respect to basic human rights. i didn't include the USA. even if i wanted, since gitmo, i simply cannot anymore. and nobody should. "As a practial matter, I suggest we all ignore "international law"" ignoring international law will make us no different to animals. good to see that you do seem to want that. in fact some of us are already exactly that.
I've always suspected this was the core issue.
You should indicate that this is a flash video in the title somehow.
&gt;Do you honestly believe our founding fathers were stupid? They're not my founding fathers, but they sound pretty stupid to me.  Wasn't the whole point of the electoral college to disenfranchise slaves by allowing the slave states to count slaves at 3/5 of a person in order to increase their voting influence? Your founding fathers sound like a pack of wankers.
I believe mre5765 is confusing this system for a system wherein the states awarded their electoral votes proportional to the popular vote in that state.  In such a system, there would be no "winner-take-all" yet the small states would be over represented.
The reason they invented the electoral college was so Presidential candidates would actually go to them to have debates and give speeches so the small states wouldn't feel ignored. Nowadays, with the internet and television, where you can watch debates from anywhere, it's really a moot point.
One human one vote.  Damn you 19th Amendment!  And your meddling friends, too: 15/23/24/26
Alzheimerstan
[Best.  Class.  Ever](http://www.google.com/codesearch?hl=en&amp;q=+FactoryFactory+show:AnTKDGkjO78:R8K6xMpWVeU:FzuArTqFylg&amp;sa=N&amp;cd=1&amp;ct=rc&amp;cs_p=http://cs.nyu.edu/rgrimm/xtc/xtc.zip&amp;cs_f=xtc/src/xtc/lang/FactoryFactory.java#a0&gt;:):    public class FactoryFactory extends Tool   But really, all of [these](http://www.google.com/codesearch?q=FactoryFactory&amp;hl=en&amp;btnG=Search+Code) are pure comedy gold.  "RequestSpecificProcessorFactoryFactory"?  "PersistenceBrokerFactoryFactory"? "AbstractObjectCreationFactory"?  Years of wtf lie within...
Responsibility by the sponsors, not the actual drivers.
Great point!
walk into a bar...
Well played, sir!
What I did a few months ago in direct response to Experts Exchange's sliminess was install Firefox's [Customize Google](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/743) add-on. I then used the add-on's *Filters* feature to block "\*.experts-exchange.com/\*" (without the quotation marks).  This permanently removed the site from my Google search results...
No, I'm only having a beer with my meal now. Shoot, even just last week I was pounding a liter of whiskey. That's when I knew it was too much. I momentarily blacked out, and pissed off some people. I'm glad I gained consciousness not too long after, or something worse could have happened. Moderation is key, but I learned it from experience, not by anyone telling me to settle down.
&gt; You'll need Python 10k though. [Almost](http://programming.reddit.com/info/2ay00/comments/c2b6y6)!
Since it does not display which city is winning, this is pointless. If Baghdad does win, we will have no way of knowing , and they will just choose Britain as the "winner".
the site is good
&gt; "In this post-911 era, it is the absolute responsibility of the FBI to follow through on any tips of potential terrorist activity," Parris says. "Are people going to take exception and be inconvenienced by this at times? Oh, yeah. ... A certain amount of convenience is going to be offset by an increase in security." Oh yeah, people are going to be coming back from busting down doors in Iraq and joining police forces across America with that attitude. 
Yes, a civilian would use an upside down flag in any number of circumstances. In the case of a natural disaster, say an event like NOLA's encounter with Katrina, an upside down flag would mean "I'm here, I'm alive, and I can not take care of myself right now. Please save me."  There aren't always cell iPhones and TV's available.  I could also imagine such a signal being used in a non-disaster situation, such as a kidnapped victim not being able to use any electronic communication, but somehow managing to get such a distress signal displayed.  If my neighbor displayed an upside down flag, you better believe I'd come investigating.  If they tell me they displayed an emergency distress signal because Bush is president, I'd be sure to let them know they are fucktards and I won't be responding to any other distress signals, like smoke coming from their attic, or blood curdling screams, cuz hey, maybe they lit their house on fire to protest the war in Iraq... you never know with those crazy Wilsons...
I was excited about my high score, which put me in the 99th percentile, as well. But apparently reddit users can spot a fake boob when they see it.
This isn't direct democracy.  It's a scheme to make effectively a whole bunch of little winner-take-all states.
I wonder when they will start circulating the aelph zimbabwe note.   
How many RequestProcessorFactoryFactories could a RequestProcessorFactoryFactory RequestProcessorFactoryFactorize if a RequestProcessorFactoryFactory could RequestProcessorFactoryFactorize RequestProcessorFactoryFactories?
Modded up just so I can see the comments.
Fine, take my money, but use it to the betterment on America. I want my taxes to go to education for all. I want my taxes to go towards healthcare for all. I want my taxes to go towards helping those less fortunate to get back on their feet to become productive members of society (and by productive I do not mean making money, I mean helping America be greater).
&gt; a new study testing the relationship between grades and delayed sexual activity. Title is wrong.  Study shows that having sex ruins your grades (but is worth it. ;-)
Do you spend every minute of  your day learning something useful? It doesn't seem so, you're commenting on reddit!
So God changed his mind? You'd think that an omniscient being would have seen the error of his Old Testament teachings before hand, and never had made them. The New Testament presented a kinder, gentler God because that's what the people wanted.
You have to enter all your information before it gives you your answers. It confused me at first too. I got 17/20. Girls can always tell.
Keep scrolling.  The obfuscated answers are still directly after the question.  Just go alllllll the way to the bottom.
really cool website that lets you scroll through every mac homepage since 1997. Also some ideas on what's yet to come in the future
Say what you want about the products, (I am a mac user) but the 'softies are very smart.
&gt; The only reasonable requirement might be swearing an oath of loyalty to the Constitution of the United States, holding it supreme above all governing bodies, **both secular and religious**. I'm confused. Normally the bolding of that statement would be done by later commenters, pointing out how your obvious bias against religion shows that it's clearly not easy to make a reasonable test. But you've actually done the bolding *yourself*. Is it possible that you don't get how ironically self-defeating that is?
&gt; “In new tests conducted by a university food safety professor, a generic non-stick frying pan preheated on a conventional, electric stovetop burner reached 736°F in three minutes and 20 seconds, with temperatures still rising when the tests were terminated. A Teflon pan reached 721°F in just five minutes under the same test conditions (See Figure 1), as measured by a commercially available infrared thermometer. So you think he just falsified his results? Occam's Razor. Obviously food and oil doesn't reach that temperature, but those are distinctly different from the pan. How are you measuring the temperature of your pans?
I was talking about XML-RPC just yesterday, with a colleague. We were wondering wether XML-RPC would be a good thing to use (we decided yes), and if so, what library (if any) we should use. He said Apache, I shuddered (too long with Axis), grimaced, and asked if there was anything else.  The claim was that it wasn't _too_ bad, as it hadn't been an Apache project for too long. I said I'd have a look at it (as it would be me that would be using it most). ... Over. My. Dead. Body.
According to this I'm a freak'n genius.  With an IQ as high as mine I should be able to see through trees and things!
Incorrect! Wonkette is a great site. It's well-written, well-informed political satire, which pulls no punches no matter what the target. This is one of the rare times that they've put together a truly somber article, and that's only because this is such an unbelievably disgusting story.
&gt; “In new tests conducted by a university food safety professor, a generic non-stick frying pan preheated on a conventional, electric stovetop burner reached 736°F in three minutes and 20 seconds, with temperatures still rising when the tests were terminated. A Teflon pan reached 721°F in just five minutes under the same test conditions (See Figure 1), as measured by a commercially available infrared thermometer. So you think he falsified his results? Occam's razor. How are you measuring the temperature of your pans? If you're not measuring your pans, then all you're doing is stating your guesses -- which, for most people, are notoriously wrong.
Eeeeenteresting.  It looks like they do that some of the time, but not all of the time.  I've got another one that I submitted to Google a few weeks ago, and it's still showing no  sign of the answers that the Google cache holds. Looks like they're even slimier than we'd thought.
Why do you have roundabouts with traffic lights? I thought the reason for them was not having to add traffic lights?
Incorrect. Athletes make more money than non-athletes. Even The Game of Life admits this, which is the canonical anti-athlete book.
It's only derogatory if you mean it to be, I refer to myself as a dork.
very ooooooooold
あれやこれや自問を繰り返してきた訳ですが、今後もそうしていきたいなと思いました。  自分の世界の中心かあ。
Facing the fact I have to read your crap again: Hell yes, I am...
Or he could be inferring a causal relationship between the two when there was none.
I don't know why everyone seems to grow a stick up the ass every time someone says that. I don't think I've said it before on this forum, and I don't spend my time saying it IRL, but this one time it seemed appropriate in the context of the joke, so I went ahead. If I offended you, well, tough titties. Tell yourself I'm lying for a cheap laugh as you softly cry yourself to sleep...
I totally agree.  If they're not willing to allow you to view their website without signing up then they should be excluded from google searches.  It's a pain in the ass and means if you use the "I'm feeling lucky" option you'll end up going directly to a page that's useless to you.
That's unfair! I made my edit as soon as I posted. You know darned well what the problem is (that I don't care enough to work around reddit's asterisk issues), and you used my vexing predicament to mock me! ...  Upvoted. 
Precisely.  Displaying a flag upside down is just like screaming for help.  It could mean that someone is kidnapped and can't scream for help, but was able to get a non-obvious cry for help out.  Granted, I can't think of a lot of other plausible scenarios where it would be used in a non-natural disaster scenario, but I'd damn sure investigate if I saw one.  Not investigating is like ignoring a scream of "Help! Rape!!".  Displaying a flag upside down in protest is like screaming "Help! Rape!!" and then when your neighbor comes running over with a gun, explaining to him that you are just being raped by the IRS and there's no reason to come running with a gun.
New Jersey is the roundabout capital of the world.
You only pee in toilets and sometimes in alleys when you're drunk? What do you do the rest of the time?
Not enough abstraction; should be RequestProcessorFactoryFactoryFactory.
Pardon me if I am missing something, but this is a Democrat-controlled Congress, correct? Meaning it's the Democrats who don't want a paper trail... or photo IDs of voters.
The alternate to "tyranny of the majority" is "tyranny of the minority".
It's a lot closer than what exists in California now.
A bit skeptical of the 99th percentile stuff, I got that too but I only got 13/20, maybe if nobody else was in your age group, it defaults to 99th percentile.
Why is this shit popular?  I swear to god if I read another blog entry by some retard listing all the things in life that cost money which he doesn't enjoy and labels it "10 things that will ruin your life" I am going to post an angry profanity ridden comment on reddit.  Oh you don't like shopping, or latte's, or MMORPGs or god forbid going to the ATM in the convenience store?  Kiss my fucking ass douche bag.  consumerist die in a fire. Here I have taken the liberty of writing an improved list.  I think this will help all of the latte-free bloggers who avoid paying atm fees and for some reason are still broke. One Tip That Will Ensure You Stay Broke 1.  Have children.   Kiss my ass I'm off to spend $2 on something.
Very nice!
I'll grant, using language as a barrier to equitable *pricing* is annoying.  But look on the bright side: [one can imagine worse possibilities](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/wales/north_west/4605768.stm).
similar here. never had problems meeting girls and later women. smart and funny plus somewhat athletic rules.  (dancing and some sort of non-technical / cultural interests don't hurt either.)   
&gt; if you dont look like a supermodel or aren't rich then i dont want to talk to you. Oh, no!  Such a missed opportunity! [m2thedeep](http://reddit.com/user/m2thedeep), I shall always remember you as the one that, fortunately, got away, and I shall always be grateful for the time we didn't spend together....
Stop whining. For once, it's in the Republican's best interest to do the Right Thing (TM) and you break into a hissy fit because it doesn't benefit your favorite party. Honestly, the current system sucks, and while the district system is not as good as a countrywide popular election, it still beats the insanity that is winner-takes-all elections. Edit: Sorry about the slightly knee-jerk comment, but it does feel like the only reason the author dislikes the measure is that he doesn't favor party B.
FTA: Re: Mates "but the truth is that Americans lack the concept completely" signal9 - You have lived in Australia? Until you do - you opinion is based on ignorance rather than experience. Grow up.
I'm not sure I see how a comparison against biz majors is relevant in a discussion about intellectualism, though.
Jesus you could be onto something there! Pipe down, before They tap your phone!
Damn Straight. Thank you so much leperkuhn for bringing this to attention!
Or most other states. But abandoning the winner-takes-all system only in some states and not others skews the results further from what a direct proportional vote would decide.
So it's "just as long as **I** wouldn't have to do the hard work". That's just pathetic.
The alternative is to have the 40% silence the votes of the 60%. 
As the other poster said, you won't get dangerous temps unless you are doing something wrong.  Turning the burner on high for 3.5 minutes with nothing in the pan counts as doing something wrong.  Most people would assume that doing that might damage the pan, and the good professor's tests show that that is indeed the case.
&gt; A bloody, naked 19-year-old woman who police later determined to be Marquez's daughter and the girl's mother was in the room, chanting "something that was religious in nature," Tranter said. This sounds different than the Sunday morning services I am used to. I am intrigued by your ideas, and I wish to subscribe to your newsletter.
Isn't that just punishing the share-holders again who were the victims of the Enron, Worldcom, Qwest, ... etc management shenanigans? The perpetrators went to jail, why should you now punish the victims?
&gt;I just won't do it in any way that's going to further the aims of their church. banditski observed above that the aim of these church soup kitchens is to help the poor. You may be afraid of incidental benefits to the religion from your positive association with it, but that is the first step down the road of neo-atheism. Neo-atheism goes so far to demand that atheists not tolerate particular religions that might otherwise be seen as a net good, because of the incidental benefits that fundamentalists would derive from the legitimization which that tolerance would bestow on religion.
There's kind of a funny implication in that statment: In the *pre-911 era* it wasn't that important?  (evidence to the contrary...)
no
The funny thing is, the favorable responder group probably includes the set of people who respond to cries to reduce instances of religion being forced on people with "If you don't like it you can just GIT OUT".  Ironically, the founding fathers would have wanted just these 71% of people to just "GIT OUT" themselves.
(shrug) so answers.com has a shitty dictionary. Seriously, the etymology points to a usage of the word which I believe has completely eclipsed all others in modern popular usage: &gt; But if one brainstorm could produce fertile ideas, how about a whole monsoon? Alex Osborn of the noted advertising agency Batten, Barton, Durstine and Osborn had a brainstorm of his own in 1938: the brainstorm session, or group brainstorming. In the 1950s Osborn's style of brainstorming took the business world by storm. An article in Business Week in 1955 explains that it involved "free-wheeling sessions that encourage wild ideas but prohibit any evaluation or discussion until the session is over." Both the method and the word have spread to other countries and languages. It even shows up in Russian as a word pronounced very much like brainstorming.
Hate to say it, but DC probably won't drop much unless Congress recinds the law forbidding development over 20 feet taller than the street width (which is the actual law!).  RE is a fixed commodity, and the local economy is pretty hot, which draws a lot of people to the city.  Add to this the coming centralization of military facilities towards Ft Belvior, and you've got a recipe for DC prices being at least stable for the forseeable future. Granted, I've got a 1br bought for 213k$ a mere six months ago, so I've got a horse in that race...but I kinda wish I'd bought in Alexandria because of the repositioning initiative. Also, the height limit is one of the most attractive things about the inner city - my little five-story has nice views of the Cathedral.
All your base are belong to us.   And your jpgs
Cashier rude, customer pissed, company and boss apologize after cashier and customer independently report incident.
Faulty logic. (∀x)(Cx → Gx) does not imply (∀x)(Gx → Cx).
There was an explosion in the Design Patterns Factory, and the result was Apache XML-RPC.
Creepy to the extreme. No more than an hour ago I started blocking them from my searches. I was trying to solve a firewall NAT problem, and that was the only site returning results. I said enough was enough, blocked it, and found the answer right away.
HAHA. Well, that showed a smidgeon of intelligence and creative fantasizing.
It’s about time! I’ve been saying for years that Jellyfish have far too few heads.
It's a shame isn't it that just about everywhere "native" means: act like a wanker...
Here's the [Magazine cover](http://hollywood.outsidethebeltway.com/2007/06/leann-rimes-shape-magazine-cover/)
Everything is built up from the subatomic level (hence everything that exists had to come out of probability through observation). Maybe you should go back to learning about quantum theory.
Their oak would be bamboo with a plastic oak-patterned veneer.
I'm not going to pretend to have been following this closely enough to have an informed opinion, but regarding   &gt;Show me the proof that he was hit in the forehead with three M-16 shots at closer range. Don't tell me that the papers show that. Show me. You want to see the corpse?
I would have to vehemently disagree, do you remember CNN during the first Gulf War?
It works for me. Experts-exchange is pretty swift.  They allow it to be open for a certain time period after the solution is found.  Then they obfuscate the discussion once it's listed on google.  AFAIK, they're not submitting one page to google and one to you, they're just changing it once it gets indexed. Usually (not always) the cache works.  I'm really surprised they don't disable google cache in their robots.txt file. For sites that **do** serve one page to google and one to users,  there's a trick.  Go get user-agent-switcher for firefox and set your user-agent to identify as google. You'd be surprised how often that actually works :)
the good boobs were fake and the crappy ones were real, just like in real life!
Fair enough. Bad recall on my part.
People need to stop playing the industry's game and using their ideologically-charged terms. It is not Digital Rights Managment. The accurate term is: **Digital Rights Restriction** Start using this. It can help change the game.
swutAMtawkinbout -
Bullshit, i tried this it didn't work.  This hospital has wi-fi!!
For those who preheat their pans (that is, most experienced cooks), it's not that difficult to leave it preheating for 3.5 minutes. In fact, it's extremely easy. Basically, people saying that it's impossible or even difficult to do are wrong, and people saying it's harmless don't know what they're talking about. It's well-documented that it's killed birds, and it's well-known that these chemicals are harmful.
Is this also the gene that controls evilness?
Oh for god's sake are you anal.  I don't care if I'm off by a factor of 10 or more, 50 pounds is a shit load more dumped into the lake than the 2lbs by BP.  And no I'm not going to limit it to just Mercury.  Any seriously toxic substance should be considered.  It doesn't matter if I die from mercury poisoning or get cancer from benzene poisoning - I'm still dead.   The point is, even a basic mental excercise such as the one above would lead you to believe that sewage waste that doesn't properly remove all those substances is probably depositing a shit load more into the lake than the BP plant.   You're bitching about the lumberjack chopping down a few tree's but ignoring the forest fire right behind you.
In my country, they would go crazy for these two.
those greedy bastards anything to increase profit
nice table
Install [Peer Guardian](http://phoenixlabs.org/pg2/) as soon as possible.
Fire axe.
This guy is an asshole. That is not in dispute. Bombing Muslim holy sites would only guarantee a century or two of all-out war (non-conventional, of course). And killing massive numbers of Muslims (perhaps 1 million in Iraq already) has had no deterrent effect, either. So that said, can anyone think of anything that *would* be a deterrent?   
Please point out where I said "nobody has ever seen a born again christian interfere with a crime scene".
He didn't seem all the pissed off to me.
I dunno. I've always been partial to the guy from Def Leppard.
True enough, but it's more certain for the people they already deal with.
OK - so none of you has ever read the proper instructions on how to use a non-stick pan then. Firstly, non-stick pans should only be purchased when they are heavyweights. Any and every chef will tell you that lightweight pans are essentially useless: dropping food in immediately lowers the temperature of the pan, and food boils rather than fies. So - throw out all those lightweight non-stick pans. Stick with known-good brands like Le Creuset. Secondly, non-stick pans must be used in the following manor (particularly over a gas flame): The flame or element should be approximately half the size of the pan, AND NO MORE. Use only the lowest heat setting on gas, or a temperature which only JUST makes butter bubble if you drop a dob on it. DO NOT ever turn the flame up to maximum. Let the pan do the work - not the element. Cooking at too high a temperature is not good. Smoking pans are pans which are too hot. No pan should EVER smoke! Whe3n you have finished cooking, do NOT drop the pan into water, or cool it quickly! Let the pan cool down naturally. This prolongs the lifetime of the non stick surface. I think you will find that if you follow these simple rules, the temperature in the pan will NEVER exceed the temperature at which dangerous chemicals are released, or where the Teflon starts to denature.
agree with thesalmon...oversell and you risk business death...it is a smaller world than we think!  Great post!
Issues ? It's a feature :)  
Groan.
Exactly.  This can easily become a virus spreading out of control. Understandably, people will argue that the market will determine real estate prices over the long term.  The problem is this isn't a real estate bubble, it's a credit bubble. If that ever spreads to home refinance(it will)/car/student/credit card then it will get really nasty.
Or it is Halloween and they have a cold.
God forbid someone tries to save money.
Reminded me of [Canyonero](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pgV9Kp8QzOA).
That bastard better pay child-cow support if he ended up knocking up one of those defenseless cows!!
No I don't think he falsified his results, I don't think he had anything in the pan. The pan gets that hot because there isn't anything in it, the metal of the pan essentially becomes part of the burner since it's not introducing heat into anything. Do an experiment (with a cheap pan!) and see for yourself. I can't on my current stove top because it's a flat top and adjusts itself based on temp and won't let things get crazy. If the pan temp itself was realllly hot, let's say 700º, oil sitting directly on the surface of the pan would either smoke very heavily or ignite and cause a grease fire. You'll definitely know if your pan is dangerously hot because smoke will be pouring out and or there will be flames. I would not advise trying that out if you did try and experiment with an empty pan, grease fires aren't fun. In the case of a non-stick pan, which is most useful for delicate items like eggs, you don't want to get past medium low anyway. In terms of degrees, eggs start to set at around 160º. That's really easy to get to, even starting with cold eggs.  I seem to remember a sticker on my non stick about not going over 400 (maybe 500) degrees. I took note and didn't think much of it since.
me too. Over the last 2 years I have shifted to giving them about 50% dry food and 50% boiled chicken drumsticks (inexpensive and they seem to like it very much). Boiled -- for the fear of salmonella and parasites. I am sure they would've preferred raw.
&gt;You seem to be claiming that lots of people sending unDRM'd music around is proof that people have taken a conscious decision not to purchase DRM's music. Exactly. It's not just that they send the music around. It's that they use it, and share it in the clear. And they expect to be able to do so, without concern for who owns the music.   The network of people who expect to be able to distribute their own music as they wish, makes things like Zune a doomed product. Zunes 3 song trial, is effectively the same poison pill that printers add to prevent counterfeiting. Except it's for all materials in the Zune, rather than just specific materials on the printer/photoshop. The market in "illegal" music is far bigger than the DRM market. This is a dramatic success. There is no way to reverse this and so record companies, the distributors of music, are being forced to do business without the ability to force their customers to use their product in a certain restricted ways. Take another example. The web itself. The fact that you can see the source code of every page, as well as request the javascript, css etc, spreads web ideas faster than they would otherwise. Heck, cutting and pasting content from web  sites is pretty much how most people use the web. It was designed for this type of open collaboration. Now consider those people who figured out how to deny people the ability to cut and paste the content. Those sites lose mind share, their words and ideas are stuck in a terminating downward spiral. The only thing worse than this is to take the ideas off line or hide them behind a pay wall. The idea of creating a similar thing for the analog world is a huge step backward.  Open systems win by promoting their use and distributing the tools that advance the use of open systems. VLC is a great example of this. It plays all media no hassle, no codec search. It's an open tool that replaces windows media player. The more tools like this available the more people will be able to easily switch to linux - the more victories open systems win. There's no need even to discuss all the nasty internals of how Microsoft binds Media Player so that it is less useful. There's no need to even use it. And it's not just a technical thing, it's a basic principle of rhetoric, you do not cede your opponent any thought share via your own words and actions. You certainly don't give them tools that advance your opponents system, as a method of protesting that system.
makes sense... 1s do 1s, 10s do 10s...it just so happens that if you're a 5, you stand a much greater chance of meeting another 5 than a 10 meeting another 10.
If you have left your pan on the burner that long, when you put something in it, it will immediately scorch. Not even peanut oil can withstand that kind of heat -- its smoke point is very close to 500 degrees.  Many experienced cooks do preheat a pan, but I know of none who preheat them on "high." You will seriously burn anything you put into a pan that has reached a temperature of more than 500 degrees.  If you're that shitty a cook, it's regrettable, but you'll probably do something else that kills you in the kitchen long before the teflon fumes get you.
cool
Look, seriously... You have no idea what you're talking about. Yes, when you're cooking under normal circumstances, you don't know EXACTLY what the temperature is.  But no, under normal circumstances, you're NOT going to get it up to over 700 degrees.    You might get it to HALF that.  Can you tell the difference between 1 gallon and a half gallon by guestimation?  How about the difference between 50 degrees F and 100?  Really?  Me too! Seriously... your eggs would be a charred mass of carbon if you cooked them at 700 degrees!  Just about ANYTHING would be except if you were attempting to sear a steak - and again, you'd be using special equipment for that, not a teflon pan.  And yes, I have used an IR thermometer from time to time. The fact that his results may be true IF you actually get a teflon pan that hot does NOT mean that this is something that's going to occur in any regular usage of the things.  As I said before, just about *anything* in your house  could release toxic fumes if heated to 700 degrees.  The solution is... to not heat them that far!  And the same is true of Teflon pans.
If by funniest you mean gayest, then sure.
'Isn't it' ... well, that might happen as well, but no. That's not what this "is". This "is" punishing the corporation, which is a person.  What I pointed out is that, yes, you can punish a corporate person, if you really want to. Are there ripple effects to doing so? Sure. But let's examine it a bit (granting that my example is a bit extreme). The benefits of corporate personhood are pretty established for things like ensuring free speech on the part of news organizations, etc, but along with the benefits of personhood it seems to follow that accountability *must* come with it. Shareholders don't want to have this bad thing happen to them, this punishment. They want successful investments. What this means is that, suddenly, companies that are more proactive about transparency now become more attractive to investers. Why? Because they're less likely to be doing evil things. There's no incentive for a company not to be monopolistic and evil. To avoid lying about performance, maybe, but not bigger "good vs. evil", non-profit-related issues; they know that corporations tend to get off the hook for almost anything. Case in point: Microsoft's antitrust case, which -- given that they used unfair practices to drive into the ground two otherwise legitimate threats (Netscape, Java) to their monopoly, it seems pretty weak to let them off with "pay us some money, and yes, we will accept MS software in public schools as payment". Given that most people acknowledge the benefits that real competition would have had for consumers, why not restrict Microsoft's freedom to operate the same way we restrict that of other criminal persons? Doing so creates market pressure (investor-driven; remember, lots of public companies could care less about anything other than valuation) to avoid doing things that are legally sketchy. Right now, investors don't care, because punishment for companies is a joke. I'm just playing around with this idea, obviously, not presenting it for serious consideration, but what's wrong with this approach -- which really is nothing more than harsher penalties for companies in order to encourage investors to encourage companies to act more ethically and transparently?
19/20: Excessive definition at the top of the breast, large breasts without sagging/too perky, and an excessively large gap between the breasts. The easiest way is to look when she's lying on her back.  If the boobs stick up, they're fake.  Since they lie on top of the rigid rib cage, only "support" can make breasts stick up like that. And no, I don't look at that much porn, I've just been to [http://www.awfulplasticsurgery.com/](http://www.awfulplasticsurgery.com/archives/007371.html#7371)
This is odd from a Darwinian point of view. Parents who care for their offspring have a better chance of passing on their DNA, thus their caring attitude becomes more common in the species. This is, for example, why we are wired to find babies cute, and instinctively want to take care of them. A bird that abandons its offspring, thereby condemning them to death, will not pass on its DNA to descendants through them. There has to be something else that makes this behaviour beneficial to reproduction for that behaviour to be common. Off the top of my head: * The news release by the University of Bath has been misunderstood, or the information has become mangled on its way, passing through non-biologists. There's no link to the study, maybe someone else can find it so we can read it? * Children in poor health are left to die. It takes less effort for the bird to take another chance at having a healthy child than trying to take care of the less healthy third. * Birds abandon nests when predators threaten them. * Birds abandon offspring they had with less healthy partners if they have found a partner that is in better health. It makes sense for them to take care of their children as long as there's nothing better available, but if a new partner's offspring would have more chances of having healthy, strong children, they will abandon the old partner's children to have children with the new one. * A combination of the above
I got 7.4, with a life expectancy in the 80's. I'm 21. So bang on average for a Canadian female. :P
Don't ask this Georgia car dealership owner for a pay raise. Police say the Lithuania native killed two employees because they asked for one raise in pay one too many times...Video Report
The GS does 24-bit addressing as well, bank-switched (same as multiplexed?).  I think that's just a basic feature of the 65816.  I didn't know it was used for the SNES...I might have to get one.
So they have constipation in Iraq.  Big smegging deal.
It already seems to be spreading to commercial credit.  Look at all the LBOs that are in trouble now (Chrysler, TXU, Hilton, etc.)
That is true - and the most mundane ones appear on CNN about two days later.
i mean i got laid
I'm pretty much with you there. What will be very interesting though, is how gen x/y &amp; c ages, each generation having had more change in thier lifetimes, and being more accepting of change as beneficial, not detrimental.  As a typical example: Boomers had a 'job for life'. They expected to pay into a pension fund that would pay for their retirement. This mindset is reflected as they age in an overly conservative, change-resistant way. My generation had short-term contracts, and we've seen pension funds fail to pay, and we're seeing potential lifespans well beyond the scope of a state pension, so my plans for old age are very different - instead of paying into pensions, I have a long term strategy to move my earning from active to passive earning as I age, but never to stop working at things I really enjoy. I've been used to a large degree of change in my lifetime and I'm expecting (and indeed keenly anticipating) yet more. I think my generation will be less conservative when old.  I also think the generation below me will make me *seem* slow and conservative in comparison. Finally, think how much better we'll be able to handle changing culture if we're not as infirm, and more financially independent. Lets see if we can be better oldies than the boomers!
Did Blitzer and King soft-pedal like that when Clinton said "I did not have sexual relations with that woman"? 
Actually, I do know the temperatures of my pans, because I'm very often cooking things that require very specific temperature ranges, like candy, marshmallows, fudge, etc. (InnocentBystander benefits from this arrangement). What do you think a cook could do with a pan heated to 721 degrees?  Seriously.  What exactly would a cook do with a pan that hot?
No experienced cook would put an empty pan on a burner turned to high and wait 3-4 minutes. I put fat into the pan first, but some people do let the pan heat up before introducing anything. Usually that's just a few seconds, especially if you're using high heat which is not needed often. If you introduced fat into a +650º pan it would degrade and become unusable almost immediately, introducing lots of smoke and possibly flames in the process.  I'm not saying it's hard to do, I'm saying if you're getting to those temperatures you have other problems besides possible toxins from your pan. Your food is also charcoal.
Au contraire, your oven does get that hot. On the self-clean cycle.
That's what he said.
Great new wireless power technology.
Ok, I'll be the first to admit that I absolutely *HATE* the ridiculous amounts of cat-related links on reddit but this particular cat is just adorable. I'd rather have him than a "healthy" but otherwise average cat any day :)
This test is useless without bouncing.
hack exist http://digg.com/security/Hack_Lets_You_Access_Pay_Sites_Free_by_Disguising_Your_Browser_as_GoogleBot
This video makes me wish I had a cat... and bunnies...
Or we can vote for sealand!!!
How would that change? In a direct election system, you only get paid attention to if your community is "purple".  Your town is usually full of swing voters?  You'll get tons of visits from politicians.  You're all diehard Republicans?  You're just as out of play.
I'm a fan of all 7.
How many of these arabs do we have to kill before they figure out we're their friends?
Do you do a lot of cooking with your non-stick cookware during the self-cleaning cycle?
Jesus Christ, those bastards are cold. There is a new low even for them.
“Do they think their customers aren’t going to look this up, or what?” That assumes that the majority of the people who follow the bible actually bother to thoroughly read the damned thing. It seems that for all the so called piety there is staggeringly high rate of religious illiteracy. 
Who is it again that wants to abort babies, free murderers, allow so called "mercy killings", legalize marijuana, ban cigars/cigarettes, socialize the economy/health care, overtax everybody, defund the military, and ban conservative talk radio?
well, not really. The tax appraisal is different than the appraisal for a home equity loan. Sometimes tax appraisal aren't done for years and the sale price doesn't affect it much.
From the article it appears that this happens at any number of grocery stores in Mexico, so it's not something that Wal-mart thought of first.  They use the same system in the commisaries on US Military bases.  The sackers work only for tips.
You are either 12 or a complete idiot.  Suppression of free speech is done by governments on citizens and media.  What you just witnessed was The People exercising their collective power to force an *advertiser* to stop supporting hate speech.  No one has shut down B O'R.
Unfortunately, there's nothing to be gained by replying to [qwe1234](http://programming.reddit.com/info/29m6w/comments), other than a page of wasted effort. **Don't feed qwe1234**
The problem with this isn't so much the lack of pay -- after all, the idea is that they will receive gratuities -- but that Wal-Mart appears to be doing this to weasel out of having to obey labor laws in other respects.  This means that they can deny these kids breaks or anything else otherwise guaranteed to them by the government of Mexico.  Working for tips is one thing.  Working in conditions that aren't acceptable to the labor standards folks isn't.
Look at the election Andrew Jackson lost based on the electoral college, but won based on popular vote. He had a ridiculous majority (~90%) of the votes from his home state, and surrounding states. The winner take all method prevents a "regional candidate." Though I doubt it's realistic that anyone could take 70% or more from one state. But of course doing this in California would just screw the democrats hard.
A nice thick steak would work nicely on a 721º pan, but if you're cooking a steak on Teflon, you don't deserve such a tasty dinner. Cast iron, a few minutes and plenty of ventilation are all you need.
legalize marijuana
Only 20:1 ! Not too shabby! Administration is probably disappointed that it ain't 50:1 After all, the idea is to depopulate Iraq, right?
That's classic.  I just provided links to where the Bible calls homosexuality an "abomination", "unnatural", "indecent", "perversion" and "wicked".  Your conclusion?  "The bible is not clear".  Good thinking. The Bible is the sacred text of Christianity.  If you "reject" the "source" then you are not a Christian and the fact that God dislikes homosexual acts is moot since you don't believe the Bible and you don't believe in God. That's your prerogative, but what you cannot say is that "the bible is not clear".  The Bible is crystal clear on the matter.  What's not clear is you.
This is precisely why reddit is so fucked up.  Not only do people submit crap like this, people fucking upvote it.
Not only that, but show me the graphs from the last 10-20 years if you want to convince me this is unprecedented. People have VERY short memories, and that is why things that are cyclic in nature freak people out. We see it every day on reddit, posters with no concept of historical context.
I was being sarcastic, the idea was that you wouldn't ever do that.  Sorry.  Stupid interweb. On the other hand, I have often considered the possibilities of using the self-clean cycle as a way to sear things.
By the number of Reddits and Diggs this has gotten, NOBODY FUCKING CARES!!!! THIS IS WHAT'S WRONG WITH AMERICA!  NOBODY FUCKING CARES AND THE SAME DIP-SHIT POLITICIANS KEEP GETTING ELECTED BECAUSE THEY DON'T WANT TO THROW THEIR VOTE AWAY WITH A THIRD CANDIDATE!  YOU ALL FUCKING GET WHAT YOU DESERVE WHEN YOU VOTE IN YOUR LOCAL, COUNTY, STATE, AND FEDERAL ELECTIONS!  THEY ARE GOING TO KEEP LINING THEIR POCKETS AFTER THE ASS-RAPING WE KEEP TAKING! I KNOW WHO I'M NOT VOTING FOR NEXT TIME!  NONE OF THE ABOVE!  LET'S KICK THE BUMS OUT! (Disclaimer:  Nobody is going to listen to the because they are too busy with Lindsy Lohan, Paris Hilton, and Oscar the Cat).
“*Are you ready for a toxin-free colon?*” lol… That has to be the best sales pitch of all time. 
They're not out of touch with the people.  They know exactly what the people will ask them and they simply don't want to be asked.  Questions that would show the world most Americans want them held accountable for giving Bush a free ride. Saying that they're out of touch implies no malice of thought. They know damn well what they're doing the shiesty bastards. Republicans suck, and they're afraid America will realize they don't stand for most of America, even the dumb bastards that vote for them against their own best interests.
Absolutely it's still free speech.  Is it in the spirit of free speech?  Not really, though there's no thick black line.  It sounds a bit more like financial blackmail.  Your pocketbook isn't very articulate, and doesn't help enlighten anyone.
Or equality of both?
Didn't you know there was a bubble and you could have waited a couple of years for a bargain? People who were willing to wait are making out well right now.
  &gt;You scored **13 of 20** boobs! Thanks for taking my test! Be sure to tip your waitress. She has to pay for her implants.  My test tracked 1 variable How you compared to other people your age and gender:   free online dating\tfree online dating   \t**You scored higher than 99% on boobs** Who needs math when you've got boobs?
No, you're right, it is. Fortunately, though, we're training their police and military forces so they can take care of the issues however they see fit. If you want to be angry with anything that has anything to do with this war. Be angry at Haliburton and the Bush administration. Don't be angry with me and my boys for defending key Afghani government buildings and key Afghani government officials from Taliban and other religious and secular extremists who wish nothing but to FORCE their religion on everyone else even if that means MURDERING these poor innocent people because they do not believe in their ways. So you think we shouldn't defend these people merely because they live on another continent? Ignorance. Be angry at the companies profiting from the war, the Afghani peoples misfortunes, and deaths. Not at the real men and women serving not only their constitution, but basic human rights of everyone that inhabits this earth. The general rule of thumb is, do not judge something that you have absolutely no knowledge of. Reading privately written blogs and articles online or even watching national propaganda media like FOX, CNN, or MSNBC is not knowledge. The only thing you gain from these sources are these people's take on the situation which are not only distorted by personal opinion but by profit. Enjoy your rights and freedoms sir or ma'am. They were VERY well earned FOR you.
there is no way to get a hold of anybody involved in this company.
Yeah, I should've specified a Teflon pan.  We have a great stove here, but can't use cast iron because of the ventilation issue (houses built in the thirties aren't so great on HVAC stuff).  Oh well.  It's the grill for us!
The left (of which I consider myself a part) shouldn't be using shitty tactics, period.  That's why we're supposed to be better.
"the Surge is working! the Surge is working!"  ...Ummm.. Mr. President... different surge
Sad but true. Feminists have really pushed female masturbation is a wonderful, powerful thing, and yet has degraded men and the penis for 40+ years. No wonder we are a nation of sissies. Female masturbation = good Male masturbation = bad Personally I would rather my wife use her iRabbit, and leave me alone, sometimes. Other times quickies are better. :P
It should be mentioned that the author, [Alexander Stepanov](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_Stepanov), is [the key person behind the C++ Standard Template Library](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Standard_Template_Library#History). His interviews [[1]](http://www.stlport.org/resources/StepanovUSA.html) [[2]](http://www.sgi.com/tech/stl/drdobbs-interview.html) are also worth reading.
You certainly are confused.  On that we can agree.
Slate losing more credibility with every article...
Lots of interesting documents by this author on the domain. [Even one on Scheme](http://www.stepanovpapers.com/schemenotes/notes.pdf) ::Bookmarks::
&gt;Another example of Democrat cave-in? nope. more like: "Another example of Democrats."
_I am advocating a multi-fuel market which is best for security, you are advocating staying with oil ONLY._ Look closely at all my posts at this site and all over the Internet, and see where I advocate staying with oil only.  You won't find a one.   Putting words in my mouth is rude behavior. If you RTFA, and check some other sources like theoildrum.com, you'll start to learn that corn-based ethanol is not sustainable at its present levels of use.  And even cellulostic ethanol is definitely not sustainable at the increased usage levels for use by regular consumers as a drop-in replacement for gasoline. Its not to say it won't be used in some places.  For a farmer, growing enough switchgrass or doing some kind of biodiesel will probably be practical... for their own on-the-farm usage.  Near zero transportation costs mean that the EROEI is good enough. For mass-market transportation, ethanol is not going to significally help with that.  We in the USA especially, will be forced to make some drastic changes to our way of life.  In the short term, we'll need to drive less in total, carpool more, and switch to more efficient vehicles. In the longer term, we'll need to invest in mass transportation (probably powered by some kind of electricity),  Personal vehicles will become increasingly expensive, be they powered by fossil fuels, ethanol, or electricity. The electricity will hopefully be generated by some renewable source, though I wouldn't be surprised by continued use of coal (shudder) and nuclear. Remember too, the roads are paved with asphalt because of cheap oil.
when is it scheduled?
You know what happens when you pull the trigger on an M-16 one time? It shoots 3 bullets. So that's one shot.
We have tons of Pakistani's here.  And Sikhs, Muslims of all kind, Chinese, Japanese, you name em, we got em.  Try and find a white cab driver in Calgary!
Yeah - slightly inebriated shuttle passengers is not a problem: no one touches the controls until after docking - so what's the big problem? Mountain, I'd like you to meet molehill.
The ugly, intrusive multimedia ads notwithstanding, I avoid Gizmodo insofar as the site itself is little more than an advertisement masquerading as a blog...
&gt; You seem to view the business and the public as adversaries. That's an unusual point of view.  You want Home Depot to stick to business as usual in spite of how people outside the business feel about that You've got it all wrong, it's not "business vs public," it's "business vs small bunch of vocal assholes." What is a biggest puzzle to me is reddit's fucking reaction. You guys are fucking first to whine that MSM are  feeding us pabulum instead of some real discussion about real issues... BUT you don't undersand what discussion is (no, it's not Michael Moore and Al Gore kissing each other butts.)  Funny thing, anytime there's some voice that generates some controversy, one side or the other is gonna screem to silence it.  Be it Chomski or O'Reilly (although I don't see how anybody can take this guy seriously) or Ward Churchill, bunch of assholes are starting a drive to shut them up (again, why *any fucking body* would feel so insecure as to be afraid of the fucking oppinion of the fucker like O'Reilly, is beyond my comprehension.) Then you have a spineless businesses executives who pulls an ad at the first sight of controversy, and the dimwits applaud...  The effect: fucking media avoids any topics that can rub some group or another the wrong way. Paris Hilton FTW! &gt; Yet you're planning to change your own habits because of the feelings of people who are not you. No, I am changing my actions (not habits) because of _action_ of the business in question...
What an idea: 1. Breast test website.  2. Fill with exploits.  3. Post on digg/reddit.  4. Infect millions of Windoze boxen.  5. Profit!  (Literally, since zombies can be sold.) Thank you, FireFox and NoScript. (I'm not sayin' #2 is true... just that I wouldn't be surprised it someone did this.)
Statistical analysis can show anything.  Boring.  What's next?
Touché.
Personally, I think the writer is a faggot. Only my wife sits next to me, or on my lap if the theater is empty.
No, even better would be plopping them in the roundabout around the Arc d'Triomphe in Paris. Aw yeah.  (Those of you who've been there know what I'm talking about.)
This blog post demonstrates why getting a CS degree still has value, and that you shouldn't get your information from random Internet blogs. If the author did he'd know that Java already has closures.  Any function defined in an anonymous class is a closure.  Duh.  Such a function may reference *all kinds* of bound variables. I hate how untalented programmers tend to pick up academic language (*closure* is very popular) and distort it, limiting its meaning to some specific case.
If this scenario were reversed -- a Muslim cleric or political candidate declaring that attacks on Mecca would be met with attacks on New York or Washington, D.C. -- people would use it as proof that Muslims were out to get us and were pursuing global jihad. How is this not a jihad, you neoconservative fucks?
I was asked to work on the thing but it just seemed too stupid. I backed out, had better things to work on. However the vfx looked good.
I got 0 of 20. What was I supposed to do? Got distracted by something.   
dang... what a bunch of crap  I've seen the insides of my colon... nothing there except blood. Crohn's disease is a great colon cleanser.
I believe you have it backwards.   The son is a bear-charging son.  It seems the poor bear was in the process of being charged by the bear-charging son of man, while the father used the log to kill the bear.   
Gosh, just what we need - even more reasons for the politicians to gerrymander the hell out of their districts until anything resembling fair representation is eliminated. Think they can manage to make it so that blacks only make up 12% of all counties nationwide?  I think they can!  It'll be a challenge!
It's a good idea, but make sure your oven doesn't lock for the full cycle. Most do and there have many many a good experiment burned to charcoal because the oven wouldn't let the food out before it was done. I have read about that in DIY pizza forums--home ovens don't get hot enough for good pizza so there have been lots of novel attempts at getting more heat out.
I sense a pending nerdswarm on this rare flower.
lots of people say that about engadget and gizmodo, i don't know how i feel about it, though.  sure, they're just aggregating and distributing news stories from smaller sites, but at the same time it saves me from having to add 50 rss feeds to my google homepage.  most of the time i end up checking out the links to the original articles anyway.
still a cult...
You can actually put the cast iron pan on your grill, cover and get it smoking hot (most likely hotter than your oven would, grills are usually hotter) and blacken away without the risk of setting off your smoke alarm. Either way you get great results--it's hard to mess up a steak unless you overcook it.
We should also change the World Series so the team with the most runs across all seven games wins the series. Who cares if a team wins more games, its the number of runs that matter.
Oh NO!  Not the taste of salt and charcoal smoke on meat!   Anything but THAT! ;-) I mean, seriously.  I probably huff down more carcinogens every time I do up some steaks on the grill than anyone is EVER going to manage to inhale from overheated Teflon.
It's a cult. Slate never had much credibility and is scraping the bottom. It was much better, believe it or not, under M$oft.
So why didn't they kill Chomsky? Or Cindy Sheehan? Or that guy who did the "9/11 Truth OMG!!!MELTING STEEL!!" video? Seriously, why are these people alive but not Tillman? If the government is so afraid of critics revealing the secret truth of all their evil doings that they'll actually kill people to stop it, why aren't the most vocal and damaging critics dead already? Why stop at Pat Tillman? Hell, the retribution they *do* dole out to their critics is pretty tame in comparison to what you're suggesting here. They outted Valerie Plame *after* her husband revealed that the claims for WMDs was bogus, rather than killing him before he had the chance. The Washington Post reporter who broke the story of extraordinary rendition, [Dana Priest](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dana_Priest), is still alive and kicking. She even went on to expose the deplorable conditions at Walter Reed. You'd think she'd be among the first to go.
i scored in the 99th percentile too, with 15/21 boobs
What other SCMs fit this bill? That is they don't track files but 'content' as he puts it?   
17/20
Research funding bias is always reflected in research results. Case Closed. Pass the bong, please.
You scored 17 of 20 boobs!
Shenanigans!
Yeah, nothing beats FT for when you want everyone to see that you're smart and sophisticated, from up to one hundred yards away. Too bad it's kind of shit, like all UK papers.
Three
I would far prefer a 'genuine' intelligent man than an athletic jock moron. Nerds, you have to get out there and get noticed! (if necessary, shower first! :P ) There are also studies expressing that as a guy, the smarter you are, the easier it is for you to get a girlfriend (and for a woman, the smarter you are, the harder it is to find a boyfriend). So I guess smart couples just sit there and play Starcraft or watch Battlestar Galactica instead of getting it on?
a female friend gave me a tip once: they look like they're upside down, as in the nipple is often placed too high.
WTF? Why not build some canopy structures instead of having thousands of umbrellas? **Edit:** The other thing I don't get, is why have so much shade anyway? I love lying in the sun on the sand. It looks like I'd have to go in the water to get any sun.
..or just uncheck (Preferences / Options, depending on platform) -&gt; Content -&gt; Enable Javascript
I was talking hypothetically. This doesn't affect me personally since I am hobbyist programmer and don't have anything worthwhile to release, free or proprietary. However, all the stuff you mentioned is exactly the reason why I find it hard to believe that any serious end user application will be developed using 100% .NET 
Where the hell do people get this smart=non-buff bullshit? Wake up... I know PLENTY of super buff dudes that can't get laid to save their life. Why do you think there's the gym's having gay dudes stereotype? Here's a hint: it's the only place they can get laid. God. Oh and by the way... dryice, I bet you're smart too (read: according to the IQ correlation that'd STILL mean you statistically, should be getting laid less also. I know hot women that don't get laid a lot so this fits reality, for me).
If you're going to mod me down, at least provide evidence to back yourself up. Here's my evidence.  From [Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Closure_(computer_science)): &gt; In computer science, a closure is a function that is evaluated in an environment containing one or more bound variables. That's all.  Anonymous classes in Java contain anonymous functions.  These anonymous functions can reference variables, such as final variables of the parent block. Example:  interface I { int F(); }   class C {    void DoSomething() {      final int N = 10;    // Look how this object depends on N     I i = new I() { public int F() { return N; } }    }   } See how the object `i` inside `DoSomething` references the variable `N`?  That makes the anonymously-defined method `i.F` a **closure**.  From [the WP article](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Closure_(computer_science)) again: &gt; In some languages, a closure may occur when a function is defined within another function, and the inner function refers to local variables of the outer function. Local variable: `N`.  Outer function: `DoSomething`.  Inner function: `F`.  Presto!  Closure.  It's not magic. Why do people moderate comments when they know absolutely nothing about the subject?  Oh wait!  [I know exactly why](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dunning-Kruger_effect).
Oh dear. Good call.  I hadn't thought of that.  I'll run a test cycle first.
Look at that title.  Don't people know how to summarize?
you must have right clicked and selected save target/link as.  saving the image works fine.   well, except for the virus part.
Reality check:  no direct quote, no link to sources, and on top of that crappy formatting.
Wow...now that should be illegal. Merges of news corporations are always bad for the general public and yet this is even worst. Anyone remember the "not so good" James Bond movie with Pierce Brosnan and the huge news corporation trying to declare war with other countries in order to cash in? Can't remember the title but anyway this is just a step toward something like that. They got too much power, and most people seem too ignorant to figure it out or do anything about it. Are we screwed? Should we let ourselves be put asleep while the big guys decide what's best for "us" (them)?
Not sure if anyone else has tried this, but I printed the After .ps file, in colour, on my Epson Stylus, and then color copied it on the same machine just fine. I also tried it with another colour copier, can't remember the brand, and it copied just fine too.  The Epson is an Epson Stylus CX4200 scanner, copier, printer. It was like 70 bucks. Do I have a POWERFUL FORGING DEVICE? (It's like 6 months old too, by the way, so not ancient or anything.)  The other copier scanned it, then made funny sounds, then copied it. But that's just about normal.
Come on, When was the last time there was a JavaScript exploit in the wild for Firefox?
This website lists out free online paid survey sites. Highly useful 
Which is essentially what the article says.
This is the same guy screaming on the floor of the senate last year like a baby because someone proposed that the money for his "Bridge to Nowhere" should go to New Orleans instead. This guy is shameless.
An excellent website with exhaustive resources to find suitable freelance jobs in all fields. 
Bailouts will be attempted. Success?  Hope so. M3 is no longer reported because ["M3 does not appear to convey any additional information about economic activity that is not already embodied in M2 and has not played a role in the monetary policy process for many years."](http://www.federalreserve.gov/releases/h6/discm3.htm) It's a lot easier if you just lay down and take it than to fight, so I am told. 
&gt;I'm an Alpha male.  &gt;  &gt;And girls want to fuck alpha males. Let it piss you off as much as you want, but you know it's completely true. That girl you like who is kinda cute in a weird way, but is totally sweet and you have the biggest crush on? The one who keeps going back to guys who treat her wrong for reasons you don't understand? The one who calls you up at 1 am to cry about how her boyfriend hasn't called her in 3 days, and no matter how long you listen to her, she'll never think of you as anything other than asexual? The one who will curl up next to you on the couch, hug you close, kiss you on the cheek, and never let you fucking touch her beyond that?  &gt;  &gt;Yeah, I'm fucking her.  &gt;  &gt;The hot girl who won't even look at you when you nod at them and smile? The one who laughs when you trip in the hallway and drop your stuff? The one who comes up and coyly asks for your help with her homework, and then pretends you don't exist once you finish?  &gt;  &gt;Yeah, I'm fucking her too, even harder. Copypasta to the rescue!
Conflict of interest, perhaps?  Nancy Pelosi for president 2007!
This is quite possible. Maybe, in retrospect, people will only remember the weeks after September 11th. Everything else will seem like a blur of miscellaneous problems. Also, whoever Bush's successor is, they'll have to deal with a huge mountain of economic and foreign policy problems. By comparison the Bush years will seem like good times, easy credit, rising home prices, America was "kicking ass", etc. Just like people seem to think the Reagan era was like. 
no im serious. though, at the same time, i totally acknowledge my original comment is unrealistic and could only result in a corrupt voting class.
Capitalism works both ways, just stop buying the paper. Period. The NY Post is so desperate that half of the frontpage is about winning a bingo.  Let's see how soon before the WSJ has Instant Millionaire Sweapstakes above the fold.
Maybe so. The question is what are they doing about it. Maybe enough redditers will use the above link to report them to make a difference.
awwwwwwwww, poor [spammer](http://reddit.com/user/MikaelMN/submitted)
In response to the TSA's cover-your-ass security strategy, I  hereby propose that we falsify a threat to national security involving hot women hiding contraband inside their shirts and undergarments.  (Just kidding, I'm not a terrorist)
would the movies come out good picture
You bet. I've heard kids these days aren't even bothering with the ecstasy anymore, and getting high by snorting the glowsticks themselves.
god damn it.
So do you think all minorities should be politically overrepresented in order to protect them, or just rural folks?
A dark day for journalism, my ass... there's no real journalism in MSM anymore anyways...
Very effective but simple and easy-to-follow methods to lose weight. 
I'm really starting to hate reddit. Why is my recommended page full of (PIC)s? I have never upvoted a (PIC).
21? did you add one of yours? j/k
Then why don't you file a FOIA request like the [Associated Press did?](http://www.forbes.com/feeds/ap/2007/07/26/ap3958728.html)
I love how someone does a study on 50 people at MIT or whatnot with lots of obvious useful historical and sociological analysis to be done on it, and they conclude that the species is such and such a way because of biology.  I wish we could get a little internet meme making fun of them if they can't include Tsongans, 12th Century Arabs or at least some folks down at the wimmin's festival when they make conclusions about the species.  I guess the meme would be something like, "Oops Dr. Scientist, you forgot homos again!" Anyways, it wouldn't be a shock that upper middle class American academic achievers get laid a little later for the obvious historical and sociological reasons.  Still, the group does produce a pretty large number of big city homos and pervy sex nerds, so I'd want to make sure Susie Bright was in their survey before I bought that one.  Also, some people from places where the puritans didn't land.
Code name: cloverfield. fields investigated: Guna, Rob's shirt, The beast from the 20 000 fathoms.
273 mph? Not unless you dropped it from on orbit mate! Competing against the Bugatti Veyron? That is the lamest thing I've heard in years. You do know, of course, that even though the Veyron sells fro 850,000 british pounds, each car costs OVER 5 MILLION POUNDS TO MAKE. So, every time you buy a Veyron, VW lose 4.15 Million pounds. Comparing this butt-ugly bastard-of-a-car to a Veyron is like comparing an AMC pacer with a Porsche 928 GTS. Typical American bullshit: instead of actuall making a good car, you just make a quite fast, ugly-as-sin thing and make bullshit claims about it.
A while back some scally posted this on the wikipedia ["Rock, Paper, Scissors"](http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Talk:Rock%2C_Paper%2C_Scissors&amp;oldid=91782574#1939-1945_Championship) page. Picked up on reddit: http://reddit.com/info/tfjq/comments
Of course it's gonna help enemies... Cheney's enemies... ;)
Because your reference is too subtle for some plebeians. Great observation, nevertheless.
People from shit states where no one lives would cry too much.
After found guilty of war crimes, right before the lethal injection.
This website teaches us to get rid of credit card debts and find low interest offers on our purchases. 
He has 2 cores on that machine - I wonder the erlang test program used them. It would be interesting to the see the CPU usage during the test, not only the results.
My real age is 12. I could have just IMed my ex-girlfriend.
No one said the rental program would end at 5pm and I missed the deadline.
17 year olds are legal in nearly every state in the US. http://www.sexlaws.org/answer_board   
Is that a threat?
Religions =&gt; Cults with better pr.
From the bottom of page one: On Sept. 11, 2006, U.S. District Judge Algenon Marbley ordered the election boards "to preserve all ballots from the 2004 Presidential election, on paper and in any other format, including electronic data, unless and until such time otherwise instructed by this Court."
Gold - this is true of many a car... But then I would say that, I ride a motorcycle!
I bet we can't find a better website that tells us how to get cheap even free air tickets. A must for bookmarking. 
I 100% agree.  I *so* wish Google had the option to flag a search result "useless".
You say that even though the web browser you are using to write that comment was probably written in C++?
Spelled wrong sorry: F-o-o-p-b-o-w-l is correct.
Amen!  Inaction is honestly the Democrats biggest problem over the past few decades.
&gt;You will get your chance fanboi. In the mean time perhaps you can admit that it's possible for other database engines to have better implementation of outer joins.  Can you do that fanboi? Seriously, how old are you?  fanboi?  Is that a "kewl h4ck3r" phrase you learned from AOL?  Did you "p0wn" me?  Wow. Anyway, of *course* different database engines handle different joins with different efficiency!  And of course factors like indexes and constraints and join hints and table sizes and statistics play a part as well! I give up ... Read the article.  Try to understand it.  Cut and paste *one* sentence/point and simply explain why it relates only to MS-SQL and not ANSI sql in general.  That shouldn't be too hard, even for you, right? If you want to focus on performance, post any equivalent script in *any* ANSI sql product of your choice, run it and post the results.    Then again, why do I even bother asking?  Why do I waste time trying to intelligently talk to you when you don't have the decency or respect for yourself or others to do the same?
An excellent website with exhaustive resources to find suitable freelance jobs in all fields. 
OK, my mistake for not reading more closely. So yes I agree if each state chose to give their popular votes to the national vote winner, then there would be a "genuine direct election". Good luck getting the smaller states to do that. The  founders wanted a federal system that prevented the  tyranny of populous states over the less populous states (i.e. the states that hold the majority of the nation's territory). Go that route and you'll end up with situation in Canada, where the West resents the concentration of power in Central Canada due to Ontario and Quebec combined having about 50% of the country's population. There are separatist movements in all of the western provinces, in addition to Quebec. 
&gt; the mind boggles A million is not the very large number you seem to think it is. When a site gets a million requests/day, its servers only have to peak out at about 30 reqs/sec. When you store 1 million 1000 byte records it uses up less than 1% of a smallish disk and the entire set can easily fit in RAM that costs less than $200. When a small city taxes each of its citizens $10, it raises $1M. 
Based on his `erl` invocation he did not set the erlang vm for SMP mode. Running with the `-smp` flag might show interesting results.
ugh. &gt;The works of ancient Greek and Hellenistic writers (such as Plato, Aristotle, Euclid, and Ptolemy) and Muslim scientists and philosophers (such as Geber, Abulcasis, Alhacen, Avicenna, and Averroes), were imported into the Christian world, providing new intellectual material for European scholars. &gt;Greek and Arabic knowledge were not only assimilated from Spain, but also directly from the Middle East. The study of mathematics was flourishing in the Middle East, and mathematical knowledge was brought back by crusaders in the 13th century.[14] http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Renaissance#The_Renaissance.27s_origins
It's quite an interesting geological feature.  What a pity the focus on it has been so distorted for so long...
I got 17/20 by marking breasts as fake if they appeared to be "hovering".
So is a lack of faith the same is a faith in a lacking?
Anyone looking for debt consolidation must visit this website for very useful tips and guidance before approaching to a financial firm. 
Consider me a Canadian. . Now.. where is that passport....
Do any of us know what the error of margin in either study was? These sensationalist headlines aren't getting us anywhere.
If you are in war, do you prefer, "Give them strongly worded letters whereever you find them" ? Shut up.
Aren't they bullet-proof kevlar helmets though?  Thick kevlar is pretty expensive, so $500 doesn't sound absolutely ridiculous.  If it's not much different than WWII helmets though, I'd be pretty P.O.'d
A lot of these tips are very reasonable! As I read through this list, I can see a number of ways in which I can save on my frivolous monthly costs.  &gt;You don't need to play a MMORPG OH WHAT THE FUCK, DON'T TELL ME HOW TO LIVE MY LIFE, I'VE GOT GRUUL'S LAIR TOMORROW NIGHT AND THE GUILD NEEDS OFFTANKS
Ah well, that explains it.  _Goes back to the code_ 
By the looks of it, he just used an online translating program.
Dear Dr. E.  My 25 year old brother has a long history of depression and anxiety.  Our parents are often having long conversations with him to address his "problems". They have very strong opinions about what he needs to do to feel better.  He tells me that their good intentions make him feel worse by psycoanalyzing him, and telling him what his problems are.  How to I make them see that playing "armchair psychologist" could potentially do more harm than good? 
I still can't figure out whether you're the uber-idiot you appear to be or the world's least entertaining troll.
YouTube grew incredibly fast, to over 100 million video views per day, with only a handful of people responsible for scaling the site. How did they manage to deliver all that video to all those users? And how have they evolved since being acquired by Google?
I was surprised that I could eat well for cheap in NY as well. 2 bucks for mixed veggie curries and rice? Yes, please!
We need to stop putting each other in these groups of beleif or un-beleif. I simply don't beleive in supernatural/paranormal phenomena without proper evidence. I don't actively non-beleive, I simply dismiss things that are not proven to exist.
and a jew...
Uhm, ketamine is an anaesthetic. To get high, you take it in subanaesthetic doses. If you "OD", you'll get an anaesthetic dose, just like millions of people legally did in doctors' offices, before it became illegal. Edit: that is, if you inject it intramuscularly, as God intended. I think some people do other things with it, too.
Public service site about lock bumping!
So "possible terrorist" then.
Because I'm not making insinuations of grand conspiracies that I want other people to believe? I'm telling you and anyone else who believes this dreck 1) What it should take at a minimum to start convincing a person with enough sense to, say, not already think that 9/11 is an inside job and, at the same time, 2) What the bloggers/researchers/proponents of these theories need to do as a first step in order to interest intelligent, non-wingnut people.  Extraordinary claims, extraordinary evidence. I'm not making any, so that's not my can of worms.
"Anyway, just because the system occasionally burps in a way you don't like doesn't mean it's broken." Although I respect most of your post, I have to disagree on this point.  The current system allowed George W. Bush to become president.  It is clearly broken.
100%! Now if I could only tell the difference between an English muffin and a baby!
Wow. Beating two strangers with a metal baton. Just that should be grounds for prison time. Add in that he's a skinhead beating two black girls, and hate crime legislation should kick in. This is just awful.
I'd say the long-term solution to that problem is to use real money such as gold or silver (copper coins for small amounts). No real worries about counterfeiting there. Plus, no official counterfeiting either.
You're just mad because you're Hitler.
So... It's a self-service suicide hotline? :D
Yes, he probable used Google to translate the same block of text :)
This calls for a Firefox extension to filter out results of unwanted domains. Might be something similar to [this extension](http://www.distilled.co.uk/blog/seo/search-google-without-wikipedia-a-firefox-search-plugin/) (which I just googled - I didn't try it).    
No offense to all the enemy combatants out there, but most of 'em couldn't make a tight group w/ an M-16 to save their life, even at close range.
I always wondered.
Yeah, sad but true, at least in the western "civilized" world.
Look whose talking. Quantum effects have only ever been observed in subatomic level. To claim otherwise is pure conjecture ie. made up bull. When we have more evidence on the contrary, I'll reexamine my believes  but I'm not about to just accept your made up crap.
&gt;Senate Minority Whip Trent Lott (R-Miss.) said he will vote against cloture and the bill, but he was less certain about the chances of getting 33 of his peers to join him.  &gt;  &gt;"I don't how many people would have enough courage to stand up and vote against a lobbying and ethics reform bill," he said. "I don't suspect there's going to be strength and dynamic leadership here, but we'll see." Isn't this pretty much an admission that the Republicans are, in fact, just trying to block **anything** the Democrats propose, no matter how much good it might do? Is there anything honestly objectionable about the ethics reform bill?  (and no, I DON'T consider making it more difficult for you to go on joyrides in your Learjet to be an honest objection) Because Trent Lott is literally saying right here that he will help *filibuster* an ethics reform bill.
And for the three bullets in that one shot to be that close together, the shooter had to be pretty close to the target. 
It's a completely legitimate tactic.  Do you like paying Bill O'Reilly money for talking?  That's what you do when you buy a product from one of his sponsors.
Fuck those Huns!
Yes, that's what it does.  One man, one vote, in California only, while the Red states nearby remain winner-take-all.  If you want to do this thing, you have to do it everywhere at once.
What the hell is neo-atheism?  I personally do not in any way want to support religion and would like to see it disappear one day but you make it sound like an 'evil thing'. The net good you attribute to religion is incidental.
You're right... sneaky little fuckers, aren't they.
Stalin was the rock...
Its called science. You can ignore the data or accept it and learn.
this is a decent hotel.
What's interesting there is that if a whole bunch of people do this, and that happens, then the value of the service lockup as a surveillance tool (if that even is true at all) basically was just destroyed by all the false positives. Imagine if just one major magazine or newspaper ran a photo with this mark what would happen.
Surely. If having music or office noise in the background is enough to impede concentration, then it stands to reason that trying to think seriously while participating in a conversation is going to be difficult.
everything in hong kong is close together as long as you live near the subway.
"Do Not Omit Prepositions In Titles." Idiot: "Things I Learned ON Saturday."
If you are looking for used cars, this website must be visited to learn the tricks of buying them at very dirt cheap rates. 
How much of that is due to Java being Java?  As opposed to a dynamically typed language, or one that has type inference.
Well you could argue that the House of Representatives was designed to disenfranchise slaves too. Given your use of the term "wanker" I'll guess you are from a country formerly of the British Empire. In many of those countries there is a House of Commons, and many of those countries have M.P.s  representing districts more or less of equal population size, just like the House of Representatives. In the early days of most democracies, not all adults could vote. Women only in the early 20th century got the vote in most democracies. So I guess the founders of British democracy designed the system to disenfranchise women and peasants. And even today, using your logic, the House of Commons in the UK and Canada, and the House of Representatives in the USA disenfranchises children and non-citizens, because the districts are allocated by total population and not total eligible voters. No, the point of the Electoral College was to prevent the populous states from overrunning the less populous states. Given the importance of the electoral votes of New Mexico and New Hampshire in the last two federal elections, the Founder's design has been proven to work to their specification.
The most recent Popular Science magazine detailed how certain new trees grow and release isoprene(?) and it bonds with nitrogen from emissions; the combination is Volatile Organic Compounds which are big contributors to smog. Hopefully they know that.
So what? It's not like I wrote it.
All I see is you trying label aggressive or passionate atheist with some sort of label. You try to make New Atheism sound bad.  
Well, he's having sex isn't he?
I pass by this hotel to work everyday, it doesn't seem bad from the outside and it locates at the center of Kowloon.
Using anchor text in your SEO strategy is important.  It is often over looked
Undoubtedly, this is one of the best websites with elaborate info on affordable vacation deals, unknown and exotic vacation spots and cheap timeshare options worldwide. 
The best roundabout, of course, is in Swindon: [The Magic Roundabout](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Magic_Roundabout_%28Swindon%29)
As I said, this hotel is decent. I guess it is too good for prostitutes to go there.
Alright, whatever floats your landspeeder.
cool quotes from famous people.
This website has very useful articles on getting rid of pimples by easy-to-follow methods at home. A real boon for those suffering from acne 
My mom? Though I doubt any search she does would land her there...
We (CA) have more than two parties, as well. Six, if I remember correctly.
a good hotel
This is an important point in our energy history.  Good on them for at least trying...but I doubt it will make much of a difference.
The gov't must have used those lost Mars probes to destroy the face.
That assumes that 100% of the people they asked know what's going on!  "yeah...um.. sure. whatever"  That's a yes!
Treat  yourself to a memorable and totally relaxing stay at Metropark Hotel Causeway Bay Hong Kong - conveniently located in Hong Kong's leading commercial, shopping and entertainment district - Causeway Bay and the most contemporary retreat in Hong Kong.
If you're like me, interested by linguistics, and pay attention to such things you'd notice that the first word is "entrance" (as shown by the translation on the third part) and that the next word looks vaguely like "museum."  I would go left to see what's there.
And you in turn reminded me of the same. I feel so good right now. FINISH HIM.
hong kong's only online restaurant directory. It has pretty good information on all kinds of restaurants in the town.
Probably because umbrellas can be taken down when a storm is coming. A big canopy structure would be blown apart.
You realize, of course, that anaesthetics can kill you, right?  That you can, for all intents and purposes, OD on them?
In a popular vote, there are no electoral votes. What would be the point? 
If the system this guy was proposing was put into place in all 50 states, we'd have the same integrity: each person's vote would count more because they are voting in a smaller field (their district) and you won't have 51% of the vote giving someone 100% of the electoral college for that state. The bonus over direct elections is 1) keeping the tradition of the Great Compromise and 2) keeping the check/balance against the people (by using electors).
hotel internet marketing! interesting~
Why would a cat with something like that be "destroyed"? Even if you didn't know, why would you "destroy" the cat? Well, I guess if you breed cats you wouldn't want him/her. But if you practice eugenics you can go to hell anyway. Stupid people and their "purebreds". Mutts FTW.
&gt; Capitalism works both ways   In the US it's supposed to be regulated to prevent monopolies.
"_In other words, I'm right. I'm always right, but sometimes I'm more right than other times. And dammit, when I say "files don't matter", I'm really really Right(tm)._"
No; it would have one vote per *Congressional district*, plus two votes for the overall statewide winner.
The Founding Fathers figured it out, and they called it the Great Compromise. The executive branch isn't supposed to have as much power as it does today; cut back executive power and all of a sudden the compromise between large and small states in voting the President seems fair. The system isn't broken in *electing* the President, the system is broken in the *power* of the President.
You idiot. There's a special law that specifically prohibits AT&amp;T from giving out its info without a warrant. The notion that AT&amp;T is going to protect your rights out of sheer goodwill is complete fucking nonsense. Where the fuck were you in the last three years?
Ah... what's the hurry.
&gt;Show me the proof that he was hit in the forehead with three M-16 shots at closer range. Don't tell me that the papers show that. Show me. I provided a link to the Associated Press article at Forbes.com on the documents under discussion.  The article is based on 2,300 pages of testimony released to the AP by the Department of Defense in response to a Freedom of Information Act.  The article states the following: &gt;"The medical evidence did not match up with the, with the scenario as described," a doctor who examined Tillman's body after he was killed on the battlefield in Afghanistan in 2004 told investigators.  &gt;  &gt;The doctors - whose names were blacked out - said that the bullet holes were so close together that it appeared the Army Ranger was cut down by an M-16 fired from a mere 10 yards or so away.  &gt;  &gt;Army attorneys sent each other congratulatory e-mails for keeping criminal investigators at bay as the Army conducted an internal friendly-fire investigation that resulted in administrative, or non-criminal, punishments.  &gt;  &gt;No evidence at all of enemy fire was found at the scene - no one was hit by enemy fire, nor was any government equipment struck.  &gt;  &gt;The documents show that a doctor who autopsied Tillman's body was suspicious of the three gunshot wounds to the forehead. The doctor said he took the unusual step of calling the Army's Human Resources Command and was rebuffed. He then asked an official at the Army's Criminal Investigation Division if the CID would consider opening a criminal case. If you don't want to believe it, file the FOIA act request yourself.  You could be a real hero and prove what these "conspiracy theorist bloggers" are talking about is "dreck".
it is just like a reward card for people to collect points every time they eat in the restaurants, and after certain points, you get free movie tickets.
As the article points out and many other references, he was lauded as the all American by the Bush admin.  He was very symbolic.  It could have made things very bad for Bush's reelection.  He was also moderately high up in special forces and may have been exposed to things that normal 'grunts' don't see.  He would have been trusted, by the general American public if he had come out.  None of those are the case with Chonsky, Cindy etc.  Neither of them obviously stood in the way of the election or the war.  Their followers are fringe...Tillman would be considered credible enough as he was already considered a hero.  The guy got disillusioned before what you presently see in those regions was fully established. I don't know if he was assassinated or not but consider what happened to many of the key witnesses back in Iran/Contra.  Many of the same people in the White House including Cheney.  19 (approx) of the witnesses fell out of windows, got in car accidents, or 'committed suicide'.  Statistically amazing. Do you think that an admin that supports torture, rendition, possibly slave labor would blink at this? I'll trust the family and his writings and investigators a hell of a lot more than whatever Bush's military appointees say. It's surgical...they only take out people who will bring them down.  They already got what they wanted. Their boys have been paid.
To make sure people living in places other than large cities get votes? Popular voting will favor the urban population.
Most people who use the word "dude" aren't smug assholes like yourself.  If you want to become the intellectual measuring  stick don't use words that sixth grade English teachers find below board.   
people like you are what's wrong with wikipedia look, I value anonymity, very much! but there is a time and a place to actually register a username and e-mail address. Tek-Tips isn't some private bittorrent tracker site like demonoid or TPB, this is a real IT forum, with real people, professionals with real careers helping other people with their IT issues on a daily basis, and they aren't necessarily greedy capitalists either, a lot of people help out and offer their help for free and get nothing back in return except Karma points, it's not a joke, there is no room for flame wars and idiots to be speaking out about their opinions, for that kind of crap you have reddit/digg comments!
crab~~ &gt;.&lt;...i am hungry now.
Guido says, "Face reality -- Python is not a functional language. It works largely by side effects on mutable objects, and there is no opportunity for program transformation based on equivalent semantics." Glad he cleared that one up.
The point wasn't just for actually having debates in small states, it was (and is) forcing the President to *voice his opinion on the issues* that small states have.
Modded you up for the Remo Williams reference. I don't think many people got it.
Yes, because then the urban population of the US would be over-represented because that's where the votes are.
You can OD on table salt. The issue is obviously not whether you can OD or not, but the likelyhood of doing so while using.
   You scored 14 of 20 boobs!     Thanks for taking my test!  Be sure to tip your waitress.  She has to pay for her implants. 
N. Dakota is a sovereign nation, per the Founders' design. And yes, I think the minority of people represented as inhabitants in smaller nations of the Union should be politically overrepresented in exchange for security.  In exchange for yielding some of its authority, N.D. gets  disproportionate power in Congress and the presidential vote. What do the larger sovereign nations in the Union get? Security in the form of the all the other sovereign nations yielding (in perpetuity) their right to raise armies that might threaten them.  You may have noticed that in the past 2500 years a little continent called Europe that has had sovereign nations making war among themselves due to the lack of a Union. You'll also notice that after the largest war in Europe's history, the two most populous nations decided enough was enough and created a Union (which respects of the power of the smaller nations even more so than the USA does). Besides, if a Californian is envious of N.D.'s overrepresentation he can always move there. Whereas, a minority has few options to become a member of the majority (as indicated by M.J.'s disastrous attempt :-).
Yeah, but it should be clear that if *only* California does this, it's a huge win for the Republicans. They would be all for a measure to do this in all 50 states.
woah, 20/20 first time!
Most pathetic quote of all time: "Standard Disclaimer: We know, second homes are evil." Their unstated corollary is most likely "... if you can't afford one."
Untreated sewage is more than just poop it contains thousands disposed industrial chemicals and a laundry list of toxic heavy metals.  The Milwaukee sewage authority alone dumped 500 million gallons of sewage in May 2004 in a single incident and 900 million gallons of untreated sewage into local waterways from 1995 to 2001.  And has continued to dump 100's of millions of gallons into Lake Michigan since 2004.
It's actually improving the electoral college in the long run, of course.
Emo = Retardo.
So far the "giant" problems with Wikipedia were: some guy posing as an expert in religion and being outed as a fraud; incorrect reporting of Sinbad demise and some other guy being angry over accusations that he killed JFK. To look at it from a different angle: (1) loonies outed a pseudo-loony [do not tell me that theology is a hard science]; (2) Sinbad is, for all intents and purposes as good as dead; (3) that guy is so well-forgotten that he should have rejoiced over the false accusations [somebody remembers my name! I matter! -- same is true for Sinbad] Sure, Wikipedia is not entirely reliable. But what is?
There are separatist movements in Texas and Vermont.
I concur
Look at *all* the evidence jackass.  There are many things involved here...he was looking at the best way to expose what he had seen *with* Chomsky.  A little different then your jaded and glib analysis.  He could have changed the outcome of the last election...all American hero...first to volunteer and quickly disillusioned.  How could fox spin that?  They loved him before when he was still waving their flag.
&gt; We should encourage such steps while not compromising open source principles. Exactly.  Thank you for stating it so clearly.
As they should. Russia possessing by far the largest amount of coastline adjacent to the pole. America's claim to more than Alaska allows them is the typically retarded "Do as I say, not as I do" Amerikan philosophy.
  Using *big words* in America guarantees celibacy; nothing  exceeds the stupidity of young American females, not even  young American males! OK, I forgot about Asian-American  females...
"Tubes" Stevens has pretty much killed the Ethics Bill by example already, hasn't he?
Would these guys ever have power if they played fair?
Ah to be young again.  Hell - I gotta get me some e again...
&gt; .. said Abdalla Salem el-Badri, secretary general of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, in an interview with Austrian financial daily Wirtschaftsblatt published Monday. "A price above $80 also wouldn't make us particularly pleased." Why wouldn't it?  If they're "exporting petroleum", wouldn't they want the price to be as high as possible?
 &gt; &gt; We were never meant to be a Democracy. &gt; Well, I never got to vote on the matter... And why should you? The Founders risked their lives and property (and many of them paid dearly) to create something that you now have an untrammeled right to complain about. If  you want, at no personal risk to you, you can even legally and peacefully change the system if you can get enough others to agree with you. You can even do it state by state in this particular matter. 
baby oil would help too...
You know that's a mighty condescending attitude. I don't know you, but I am willing to bet that Stepanov has forgotten more than you'll ever know. BTW, he was an FP disciple for many years, till he saw the light. No, he doesn't like Haskell: http://sdexpo.blogspot.com/2005/03/dr-dobbs-journal-panel-highlights.html#comments
Does it take more energy to levitate the thing than it returns in wind energy? Also, does it create its own magnetically levitating power? So it starts on bearings and then lifts itself? Having to have a wind turbine powered by the grid to begin operations would seem to be fairly retarded. Vote #1: I don't want to live within 30 Klicks of one of these devices. I bet 99.99% of the population will also have this NIMBY attitude.
&gt;passionate atheist An atheist could be passionate about his disbelief without being a neo-atheist.  If you don't think that neo-atheism sounds good, then maybe it isn't.  I don't think it is, any more than fundamentalism insofar as it attacks pluralism.
Linkjack.  http://www.wweek.com/wwire/?p=8829
This is true. In fact, Asheville schools have [a reputation](http://www.journalnow.com/servlet/Satellite?pagename=WSJ%2FMGArticle%2FWSJ_BasicArticle&amp;c=MGArticle&amp;cid=1149190143191&amp;path=!newsupdates) in NC.
Dude. Paralyzed people have it hard enough. It's not something to joke about...  Life without legs is probably VERY hard.
You should have kept reading.
Good for them - it's time universities started standing up for their students.
I think there's a difference between the ability to delay gratification and the ability to get laid.  Do both of those fall under the umbrella of 'EQ'?
You're right about the first part, I misread your initial comment. I apologize for that. As to the second part, go fuck yourself sideways with an armload of deck chairs, asshole.
I don't think Miss Alabama's quote is all that stupid. It's uneloquent, but you get what she's trying to say.
an average american is to expect living 11 years in the care of others. ever visited a nursing home? Here's an aggregate if you catch my drift...
Wait, I thought the Germans kicked England's ass for most of the war.
Right. The voters in any state shouldn't vote for any of these schemes unless there is a rider that says that it comes into force only when all the other states have the same mechanism.
Pastafarians rejoice! 
The statistics are overwhelming but not unpredicted. The many exotic mortgages which became readily available to the subprime, and even the prime borrower, created an enormous pool of high-risk loans. When rates are low these exotic adjustables have no where to go but up and homeowners are faced with unaffordable mortgage payments where affordable ones once were. Doubling this affect is that low rates inflate home values over the short term. When homeowners become delinquent and look to refinance, they find their home is not worth what they expected. The refinancing comes at a price and often it's at the cost of affording their home.
Not a far stretch to see it happening to civilians, given that the Socialist, I mean, Selective Service is still law.
No, we be downvotin ur buckit.
Compare the US govt's actions against perceived terrorists in other sovereign states, and India's actions against proven terrorist organizations in an integral part of the country. You're unbelievably naive and uninformed about the Kashmir issue and your own government.
Hugh: Yeah, well we saved YOUR ass in World War 3. Moe: Eh, that's true.
Pretty impressive. I wasn't expecting the atmosphere to be that visible.
So don't frequent any of those establishments.  Do you see the difference between that and a mass-organized advertiser boycott?  Shut O'Reilly down and another conservative talkpiece will spring up in his place.  What then?  Buy earmuffs? "I do not agree with what you say, but I will defend to the death your right to say it." -The Friends of Voltaire   
So... a law that requires me to delete my AIM logs and family photos after a certain number of years?  I see their point, and agree with it to an extent, but I think this is a horribly misguided idea.
Better hope you're not a dog breeder, then.  Or Santa Claus.
&gt;What the bloggers/researchers/proponents of these theories need to do as a first step in order to interest intelligent, non-wingnut people. Bush Rebublicans are wingnuts.   Democrats who hate Bush are *moonbats.* At least keep your political slurs straight.
&gt; A major issue for humanity is our lack of clean drinking water. That is a major issue.  It's one we will eventually have to address whether we continue meat production or not.  I think we really do need to address the issue, and subsidies are not helping. &gt; Sorry meant societal sanctioned murder. I don't know enough about the particular religions to comment appropriately, other than to say that I don't think we should attempt to establish societal rules based on religious texts.  They are all too contradictory (both with each other and internally) to be logically used as a base for morality. &gt; That does not look like anything that could be prevented by proper handling techniques. It also did not say anything about properly cooking the meat. I would think just about anything humans transmit could be transmitted by eating other meat. Last time I checked there are major diseases that go along with improper handling/consumption of any meat and even some vegetables. Prion-based diseases spring primarily from anmals eating their own kind. e.g. BSD comes from feeding cows meat from other cows.  Cooking does not eliminate the threat. &gt; I would not want my dogs or cats eaten, but in some places they would do it without batting an eye. Would it be ok if these people were kept from society in a more primitive state to then kill and eat them? I don't think it's acceptable for someone to kill your cat or dog for the same reason I don't think it's acceptable for someone to steal your car.  Property rights are relatively fundamental, and can be established via the same logic as other basic rules. &gt; I am not going to address the rest of your argument because it seems to be circular reasoning. I don't see what I said that was circular, but okay.
Never heard of Amy Winehouse, but she appears to be quite talented.   At drinking.
companies advertise how green they are when they aren't.
All I can tell you is what I have witnessed myself.  It was a tiny amount of Ketamine.  Nothing even remotely close to a full line.  I watched a guy nearly die.  And not a guy that was any sort of "drug novice". As the average user has not even the most remote idea what the difference is between a subanaesthetic does and an anaesthetic dose, I'm going to say that the likelyhood is fairly good.  There is plenty of information out there about how Ketamine can affect a person, both long and short term.  Little of it is anything even remotely approaching good.
Eh you want to be shown a lot of things. If he wasn't shot three times in the forehead I am sure the Pentagon could leak something that effect. I mean the AP does actual fact checking for serious charges; I doubt they made it out of whole cloth. (As an aside the powers that be are very lucky that the AP scooped this one, as the major dailies tend to kind of sideline AP scoops, and the major dailies determine public discourse to a shocking degree) At the end of the day, the Pentagon does not (any longer) dispute the medical data of the shooting. When a party that has every reason to dispute does not, it can be assumed to be true. Ummm, if they wanted to put him out of his misery they could have just OD'd him on painkillers. "Sorry sir, the needle slipped." or something. Besides while he might have lost limbs, unless he had a head, chest, or neck injury, he was going to live. Battlefield medicine is really amazing.   Executive privilege is a limited power meant to protect closed door advice given to the president, not a cover up tool. I mean in the case you describe a discreet screening of depositions would have gotten rid of the problem, with much less muss.
Surely there has to be a niche novelty market for this kind of physically retarded cat. *Patents business idea*
18/20: Real breasts are teardrop shaped. Fake breasts are more round. I think the two that tricked me were really good teardrop shaped implants on women who had enough existing breast tissue to obscure the outline of the implant. But, generally, they'll encapsulate and give that "half a basketball stuck to your ribcage" look. Which is gross, btw. I watch way too much Plastic Surgery: Before and After.
I think I have a few obvious ones to add to the list: Have a girlfriend  smoke everyday  extended warranties
First, automated check-out at the grocery store and now this.
You're about to take on several hundred thousand dollars in debt and the only person you talk to is the salesman?  Serves them right.  Any beginners guide to real estate is going to give you the numbers the mortgage bankers conveniently forgot about while writing the notes during the bonanza (I know, I explicitly asked my broker about the ratios and her response was "well, they don't really do that anymore." Yikes!  I stayed well within my ratios despite her assurances I could borrow more.) The 28/36 ratio has been around forever.  If they're buying a house and don't know it, they're idiots, and there's an idiot's guide at Amazon they probably should have bought.
&gt; You have not given a justification of why killing a human is immoral * Here: http://reddit.com/info/2awxk/comments/c2b2c9  * And here: http://reddit.com/info/2awxk/comments/c2b2nv  * Also here: http://reddit.com/info/2awxk/comments/c2b4gn &gt; It is not eating meat that I object to [...] It is unnecessary cruelty I object to  I don't know what your definition of unnecessary cruelty is.  I'm not in favor of randomly beating cattle for no reason.  Nor am I in favor of killing animals in terribly unpleasant ways.  But I see the killing of animals as *necessary* for producing meat.  I see it as both natural and appropriate.
Indeed.
In-depth review of this outdoor, extremely compact MP3 player. Check it out
Ouch. Harsh.
That Fozzie character always seemed a little shady to me, too.
Look at all the evidence? I did... but if you have some extra evidence that actually proves the White House ordered Tillman's assassination, by all means, provide it. Tenuous circumstancial evidence *is not evidence*. Look, here's a theory that is supported just as well: maybe Tillman was murdered by someone who hated the Cardinals and wanted their own team to win. If Tillman made it through the war and got back into pro football, maybe went back to playing for the Cardinals, it could be disastrous. And if you think there's something Fox can't spin, you're out of your mind.
Question: Daddy what did you do in the great war?  Answer: Nothing you little brat. I was here at work busting my hump and raising your spoiled ass. 
&lt;3 i think so too
I was truly hoping for this to be funny. I was disappointed.
If only there were some technological means for large numbers of people to meet and debate, or some accessible store of knowledge and resources that would allow the "mass and rank" to be informed on the issues.
True. Basically it's to protect investors investing in companies that have a lot of investors rather than companies with a couple. Which doesn't seem fair to me.
My little Olivia's piggy's!
it also has free afternoon tea sessions for everyone in the hotel.
Then again, you can learn valuable tips like the ones above from TV ;)
it has been 8 years, this online directory is getting better and better
I was wondering how Stackless could be ready for multicore when CPython still has (afaik, i'm not a pythonista) a global interpreter lock. Can stackless's tasklets be migrated?
Wow. That was funny.
i would want a free movie ticket
It's a scary financial forecast for homeowners. The low rates created an influx of affordable funds for masses who were ill-prepared for a rising rate market. When rates rise, values drop and the affect can be crippling. This forecaster sees more bad weather on the foreclosure horizon. Perhaps itt may be years before a new sun rises on this financial forecast.
We really don't know what happened.  If he was executed, it is probably more likely that he discovered other soldiers involved in drug smuggling than his beliefs about the war that did him in.  Why don't we just continue to pressure the administration and wait until the truth is revealed before jumping to self-serving conclusions.
Blackhat SEOs have already found a way around that one too, unfortunately.
Because by not having sex with men, they are taking something away from them. Men withholding sex from women is like a giant burden has been lifted from off their chests, and they can sleep more tonight. Female masturbation is a way to punish men. Male masturbation is a result of this punishment.
@ kaddar:  I carefully double checked this when I posted. There was only one instance of the word 'republican' on the page using firefox's find command. It was in the Real Clear Politics box.   Either they updated the article, or there was a problem with my CTRL+G.   No ad hominum please, I did RTFA.
Well yeah, that was my point... that just because it has the word discrimination doesn't mean it's unfair or mean or anything.
Experts Exchange contains lots of useful advise. full answers are available with simple hacks (see other posts below), and trough the google cached pages!  Please stop digging this nonsense.
I fully agree that it can have a major effect on people's lives.  However, when Gary said finances should not define you, you immediately said that he either a) has tons of debt living in denial, or b) has tons of money and doesn't understand. You basically ridiculed his point, implying that you do think people should be defined in terms of their finances.  That might not be how you meant it, but that's certainly how you wrote it.
I am with you man, but the solution can't immediately be Utopian.  That is the problem, yes that is the goal, the path isn't directly there, it is through change and slow change (the only way humans work) that the fuel market will change.  Check your 401k next time you look, I bet it is 40-60% energy and utility mutuals.  The divestment to new sources has to draw money or it will not happen, once a fuel has more market share other fuels can jump in.  Eventually it will look smarter to make pluggable and flex fuel cars due to the changes.  Then real advancements can come if the end of these fuels is near or cause problems beyond their good. But stopping all advancement is not what is needed and I see the problem as an A-&gt;Z problem involving many factors.  Others see it as A-&gt; Utopia and it does not work that way. The oil drum has many studies funded by energy companies and "independent" sources.  The illusion of supply disruption of a strongly required resource like oil has been going on since the beginning of markets, read on gold, silver, salt, pepper, etc...  It is all the same.
Now that Avandia can stay on the market, Actos (another diabetes drugs) is also likely to be allowed to stay on the market.
That's the point.  It's a formality, but you can still claim to having won 100% of the vote, despite being elected in a completely reasonable and democratic manner.  It's funny, see.
If you are planning to obtain H1B Visa and work permit in USA, visit this website to learn to know that it is not a difficult task to do so. 
I think the initial load brings up the answers but they are soon replaced by scrambled images.
I hope this sheds some like on the American health care system.
So, is Cheney trying to say that our memories of Bush-on-his-deathbed will be fond? What about our memories of Cheney-on-his-deathbed?
Yes, but do they have as much support as the separatist movements in Alberta and Quebec?  In Alberta alone separatists have achieved double digit support in the percentage popular vote: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alberta_general_election%2C_1982 The support evaporated in subsequent elections? Why did it  surge? Because the federal government, elected by Ontario  and Quebec, made a play to control Alberta's oil industry at the expense of Alberta residents. This is exactly the situation the electoral college and the Senate was designed to avoid. Why did support for secession collapse in the next Alberta provincial election? Because the Prime Minster was replaced with one who reversed the oil policies of his predecessor  (and the price of oil collapsed making the hated policies moot). How's the separatist movement doing in Vermont or Texas? Is it even near 1% in state wide elections?   
I hope the fools on the hill realize that a large percentage of that 30% is most likely made up of apathetic, *non-voting* drones who are too busy getting kick ass new rims for their honda accords and shopping for new cell phone covers to be paying attention.
The M16 can fire in single shot mode also. It's very accurate with even just iron sites at distances up 300 yards.
Why do we assume that Dow Jones and WSJ's former owners are any less ethical than Rupert Murdoch?  How much do you know about them?  Maybe this is a net gain as hard as that might be for some folks to believe.
Oh come on, surely that can't beat ["Headless body found in topless bar"](http://www.businessweek.com/1996/32/b348724.htm)!
Yes, no, and no.
ButtRamRedneck, Sorry, he didn't get the memo that we have only have free speech if your enlightened ass is ok with what's being said.
You make a false assumption that pluralism in something like religious belief is a good thing. There are times where bad beliefs should be torn down. If I believe that slavery or pedophilia is wrong, do you expect me to be tolerant of those beliefs?  I don't have an issue with religion as long as they keep their beliefs private and stop making absurd claims. If a Christian claims that god will heal all cancer patients, do you expect me to say that that is a good belief? I personally think Jehovah's Witnesses who refuse blood transfusions are idiots but its their decision. I have an issue when they refuse blood transfusions for their children. Please define 'Neo-Atheist' since I have no idea under what context you're using it. I think New Atheist sounds fine. Your use of Neo anything smacks of an attempted association with 'badness' such as Neo-Nazism, Neo-Fascism etc.
Maybe Murdoch wanted to acquire the WSJ because he wants to create a New York Post equivalent for people who can actually read.
Hey, I recognized my wife's breasts ! Stop looking !
It allowed Carter too. Did you think it was broken then?
ditto
Holy shit.
Actually I think this title is missing the point. To a Republican it's actually ironic that the downfall of the Republican party is failure to uphold one of their standard positions, an anti-immigration policy. The message of the article clearly isn't "we should have been enforcing immigration legislation so that Republicans will win elections" it is "we should have been enforcing immigration legislation, and look at this ironic outcome of our failure to do so."
Fu all
I understand the light blue shallows, but what's the light blue ringie thingie in the middle of Africa?
yeah! These guys make me grind my teeth, and it's pretty much the only time it happens to me that I get suckered in.
photography pun!
"The only fact better established than "artificial radiation does not cause cancer" is "there is an effectively infinite amount of uranium out there". The only thing more certain than that is general relativity and then evolution." You may have used the term mockingly, but I was only using your term.   Necessity is the mother of all invention. The oil embargo of 1973 created a necessity for new sources of energy. The most striking image of the oil crisis is the long lines of cars waiting for gasoline, if any was to be found, due to rationing. Although not as apparent a strategy, increases in energy efficiency provided a way for the country to survive the shortage. Amory Lovins is a consultant experimental physicist with an MA in physics from Oxford. He has received nine honorary doctorates, a MacArthur Fellowship, and numerous other awards for his work in energy efficiency. The following is from an article of his published in Fortune magazine (the Economist, too sees Lovins as a reputable source of information:  http://www.economist.com/theworldin/business/displayStory.cfm?story_id=8133771&amp;d=2007) detailing the results of a study done by his team of scientists, engineers,  economists and consultants on reducing America's use of oil. This study was cosponsored by the Pentagon. "When the U.S. last paid attention to oil efficiency, between 1977 and 1985, oil use fell 17% while GDP grew 27%. During those eight years, oil imports fell 50% and imports from the Persian Gulf fell by 87%." To reduce oil consumption now, Lovins suggests we: 1. Double the efficiency of using oil, 2. Coordinate public policies and business strategies to speed the adoption not just of super-efficient light vehicles, but also of super-efficient heavy trucks and airplanes., 3. Turn to modern biofuels to replace another 20% of U.S. oil needs, 4. Use established, highly profitable efficiency techniques to save half the projected 2025 use of natural gas. (Details of each strategy can be found in the article: http://www.rmi.org/images/PDFs/Energy/E04-21_FreeFromOil.pdf) Another article by Lovins, called "Energy Efficiency, Taxonomic Overview", provides evidence that the United States could very significantly reduce the problem of dwindling energy supplies through the efficient use of energy. Lovins clarifies that energy efficiency is not energy conservation. "Energy efficiency means doing more (and often better) with less -- the opposite of simply doing less or worse or without." "The 39% drop in U.S. energy intensity (primary energy consumption per dollar of real gross domestic product) from 1975 to 2000 represented, by 2000, an effective energy "source" 1.7 times as big as U.S. oil consumption, three times net oil imports, five times domestic oil output, six times net oil imports from Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) members, and 13 times net imports from Persian Gulf countries. It has lately increased by 3% per year, outpacing the growth of any source of supply (except minor renewables)." "[T]he two-fifths drop in oil intensity during the period 1975-2001 reflect mainly better technical efficiency...The technical efficiency of using energy is the product of five efficiencies successfully applied along the chain of energy conversions: (1) the conversion efficiency of primary into secondary energy, times (2) the distribution efficiency of delivering that secondary energy from the point of conversion to the point of end use, times (3) the end-use efficiency of converting the delivered secondary energy into such desired energy services as hot showers and cold beer. Some analysts add another term at the upstream end, (4) the extractive efficiency of converting fuel in the ground or power from wind or from sun in the atmosphere, etc. into the primary energy fed into the initial conversion device, and another term at the downstream end, (5) the hedonic efficiency of converting delivered energy services into human welfare. (Delivering junk mail with high technical efficiency is futile if the recipients did not want it.)...Because successive efficiencies along the conversion chain all multiply, they are often assumed to be equally important. Yet downstream savings -- those nearest to the customer -- are the most important." This method of energy use analysis is rarely employed. Lovins claims that the current supply orientation lies at the root of many if not most energy policy problems. "Less than one-fourth of the energy delivered to a typical European cookstove ends up in food, less than 1% of the fuel delivered to a standard car actually moves the driver, U.S. power plants discard waste heat equivalent to 1.2 times Japan's total energy use, and even Japan's economy does not approach one-tenth the efficiency that the laws of physics permit." "On this basis [see article], the author's analyses in the late 1980s found, from measured cost and performance data for more than 1000 electricity-saving end-use technologies, that their full practical retrofit could save about three-fourths of U.S. electricity...roughly consistent with a 1990 Electric Power Research Institute analysis in which the differences were mainly methodological rather than substantive. Similarly, the author's analysis for Royal Dutch/Shell Group found that full use of the best 1987-1988 oil-saving end-use technologies, assuming turnover of vehicle stocks, could save about 80% of U.S. oil use...Both analyses have proven systematically conservative: today's potential is even larger and cheaper." Lovins then provides samples of other analysts' findings, similar to his own. http://www.rmi.org/images/PDFs/Energy/E04-02_EnergyEffTax.pdf   
&gt; Для нас важно, чтобы параллельно с устранением пиратства развивались программы с открытым кодом (It is important that along side with abolishment of software piracy open source programs would develop) 
&gt; As the article points out and many other references, he was lauded as the all American by the Bush admin. He was very symbolic. Cindy Sheehan became an anti-war protester after her all-American son was killed serving his country in Iraq. She's alive. She's not even in hiding. She's been arrested several times, yet she's never suffered a "mysterious accident" while in prison or been secretly whisked away to Guantanamo. &gt; He was also moderately high up in special forces and may have been exposed to things that normal 'grunts' don't see. He would have been trusted, by the general American public if he had come out. Several generals have openly criticized Bush and the war. For example, Lt. General Greg Newbold, who was the director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, [wrote an article for Time](http://www.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,1181629,00.html) on the subject. Do you think Tillman had a higher clearance than he did? &gt; None of those are the case with Chonsky, Cindy etc. Neither of them obviously stood in the way of the election or the war. Their followers are fringe...Tillman would be considered credible enough as he was already considered a hero. Cindy Sheehan is just as good as Tillman on paper. She has only herself to blame for being marginalized. When she showed up outside Bush's ranch, she was just as sympathetic and potentially threatening as Tillman. &gt; Many of the same people in the White House including Cheney. 19 (approx) of the witnesses fell out of windows, got in car accidents, or 'committed suicide'. Statistically amazing. I haven't seen any details on this specifically, but I'd be willing to bet it's bogus. Lots of these lists of people who died because they are remotely tied to someone or something famous are complete BS. Snopes' article on the [Clinton Body Count](http://www.snopes.com/inboxer/outrage/clinton.htm) should give you a general idea of how these things are put together. &gt; Do you think that an admin that supports torture, rendition, possibly slave labor would blink at this? No, I don't. And apparently neither do Cindy Sheehan, Noam Chomsky, Dylan Avery, Dana Priest, Valerie Plame, or Greg Newbold, because none of them are living in hiding in fear of their lives. (Edit: OK, I'll raise you a [Sgt. Adam Kokesh](http://kokesh.blogspot.com/), who served in combat in Iraq, yet is still alive. Although I'm sure the only way you'll be satisfied is if I produce another Pat Tillman.)
What's so special about a traffic circle?
Now, *that* is a well-dressed protest.
yet ATM Machines remain to be completely hacker-proof.  This one inconsistency needs to be repeatedly shouted ad infinitum
Same thing. Let me use an extreme example "shinkis shirt has a flavor of a slave owner". I'm not calling you a slave owner but I might as well be. It is called "Poisoning the well" and it is a form of ad hominem attack.
I'm one of the people who downmodded you. I downmodded you not because you were technically incorrect, but because you used a very acerbic tone to make your point, and because it was (as far as I can tell) irrelevant to the post you were responding to.
* group think Edit: [Need to read the whole page next time](http://programming.reddit.com/info/2azzm/comments/c2b0nk)
How about generalizing things a bit?  top n f = uncurry (++) . first f . splitAt n  swap = top 2 reverse
&gt; The fact that raising animals for food requires ten times as much feed to be grown (and so ten times as much farm land),  The land would be fallow otherwise. &gt; requires an accordingly massive amount of commercial fertilizers, I agree that this is a relatively bad thing, but I don't see it as a huge problem.  Fertilizers are causing some definite problems, but they frankly seem to be minor compared to some of the other things we are doing.  I also suspect that would could significantly reduce the damage by changing techniques, just as we can reduce the damage caused by growing plants. &gt; and is one of the largest industrial contributors to pollution I agree that they pollute, but I'm not so sure that they are one of the largest polluters.  I'm also pretty sure that livestock could be grown in a much less harmful manner than they currently are.  The pollution argument isn't an argument against meat eating as much as it is against wasteful farming (and basically, factory farming). &gt; during a time of quickly rising energy costs, on the cusp of major climate chance due to energy consumption and pollution, is a weak argument for not consuming animal products? The climate change issue isn't really related to livestock farming so far as I know.  Neither are energy costs. &gt; Most vegans do not behave this way, just like most abortion activists don't bomb clinics. Everything has its extremists and it is a fallacy to stereotype all such individuals by the most publicly visible ones. Groups *are* judged by their visible portions.  If vegans don't want to be associated with the extremists, then they should start speaking out against it.  They should also stop being members of Peta, which has fairly well-established ties to some of the extremists, and is also very much responsible for calling meat-eaters murderers and telling kids that their parents are murderers.
Yeah they caved in to the perpetrators of the email harrassment campaign, real backbone.
Machine Learning, Data Mining, Natural Language Processing, and Visual Analytics are all what has become of AI after the great winter.  The mainstream no longer has faith in the intelligent machine reality (apart from the movies). BTW: After the great data mining debacle with the FBI a few years ago, we no longer talk about data mining in such circles -- we use the phrase "visual analytics" instead. But, don't be deceived, data mining is alive and well in government circles.
An excellent website with exhaustive resources to find suitable freelance jobs in all fields and result-oriented  home business programs. 
It's cause Bush and Cheney both need to be on the chopping block and she is 3rd in line for the Presidency. If she backed it, the Republicnas would label it a power grab.
You also found out the hard way that any comment even slightly sympathetic to an o'reilly position gives you insta-megadownmod on reddit, even if you are personally against many of his viewpoints.
Poor bridge. Never saw it coming.
You got something against waffles?
You have to admit that he's right, though.
I do not see what is at all newsworty/unusual/interesting about this site. Was there some subtle Irony that I missed?
[Chicago Tribune article:](http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/local/nearnorthwest/chi-bp_18jul18,1,6666638.story)  &gt;State officials exempted BP from Indiana environmental laws to clear the way for a $3.8 billion expansion, which will allow the Whiting, Ind., refinery to process more heavy Canadian crude oil. **They justified the move in part by noting the project will create 80 new jobs.** There is no way that creating 80 jobs is a sane justification for toxic dumping. A far more likely reason it's being allowed is that some money was exchanged for some promises, which also explains why the Dems are reluctant to put on the brakes.
Hi Raganwald.  I like your blog posts, btw. &gt; If you do that, you will find that Lispers, and Rubyists and Haskellers are all talking about something very different than an **anonymous class**. [em mine] I did not say that anonymous classes are closures.  I said that *methods defined in anonymous classes* are closures.  This is a big difference.  Any definition you find will back me on this. &gt; in practice it is less flexible than what other languages call closures The definition of "closure" does not imply having access to the *entire* lexical environment in which a function is defined -- this is what you seem to be implying.  A closure is just a function that operates in some environment! I think it is only recently that "pop cs culture" has degraded the term to mean something else. &gt; Wouldn't it be better to say that anonymous classes are sufficient unto your personal needs? And accept that other programmers have a need for (insert name here)s that require less boilerplate and have more flexible access to local variables? I'm not making this argument!  I am very enthusiastic about *better* support for these kinds of programming constructs.  If you want to call me something, call me a Python programmer.  My point, though, is that Java *definitely has closures*.  I agree with you that many other programming languages have more extensive support for closure. I would invite you to adjust the [Wikipedia article](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Closure_%28computer_science%29) accordingly, both to change the definition of the term, and remove its section of Java examples of closures, if you think that my argument and its definition are so flawed. I would also be interested if you could provide me *any* published work that uses your sense of the term (i.e., closures must have r/w access or must see full lexical scope). I don't think it's fair for you to say that a few tiny programming communities get to redefine a programming term that has been in use for over a decade, and is used very heavily in published literature *and* online in a way that agrees with the usage I present in my posts.
Info about the British Empire Union - Sounds fascist http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/British_Empire_Union
You own don't count.
Consumer is a king these days. When mobile phone companies are vying with each other for a better market share, it's our fortune to make use of it best. Find out how we can get free cell phones. 
20 out of 20... maybe I really am qualified for this Federal Breast Inspector card I carry...
Yeah, Steve Weir happens to run my county elections.  Seriously, sounds like he is either on the take or totally confused about technology.  Or both.
"Now, this story begins in nineteen-dickety-two. We had to say "dickety" 'cause the Kaiser had stolen our word for "20". I chased that rascal to get it back, but gave up after dickety-six miles."
I have a job doing this stuff.  I've learned how important cable management is to keeping a network maintainable.  Some of the places I've been to looking for an upgrade to their system didn't look much better.  I couldn't tell you how those things were maintained.
An excellent website with exhaustive resources to find suitable freelance jobs in all fields. 
Uh, then you may not want to look up "scrotum" in an English-your language dictionary…
Though, it might have something to do with no exposed outputs and being built into a wall.
If the machines can't make a paper trail, then mark it down on paper and count it so there is one. Seriously, how hard is that? The only reason for not doing it is for caring about the makers of defective goods.
I liked that, as sappy as it was.
You know, Nader and others have been consistently speaking truth to power but democrats just don't listen.  Why do you folks believe that Pelosi is your savior?  People, she is as much part of the problem, a card carrying member of this corrupt system, as anyone.  Come on folks, you need to wake up and realize that true power in this country follows wealth, end of story. If we made politicians take real vows of poverty I believe it would completely transform the government.
You're right about gold in a truthful sense. It still buys the same amount of comparable goods and services it did 6,000 years ago. Realistically speaking, Gold buys more pieces of paper we call "money" like euros, dollars, pounds or lira when you print more of them.
I guess that puts us in third?
The number of people I'm sure are my intellectual equals is ... limited to say the least. Anyone who lacks moderately high analytic intelligence doesn't even register as a person to me. Dating them would be bestiality which I'm not into. And high analytic intelligence isn't sufficient to make someone attractive to me. They've got to have high synthetic intelligence as well, which is extremely rare. The total pool of people I know to be my equals adds up to less than a half-dozen people, of which two are female. So I don't have a dating pool, I have a drinking hole.
Agree. This website is fucking irritating, but I didn't think to use cached so at least I can do that now. In any case, my complaint is submitted. Like someone said above, if enough of us complain something might be done.
"The average user"? So if the average user is an uninformed idiot who, instead of getting pharmaceutically produced vials*, calculating a dose based on his body weight, and injecting it, like the medical profession had been doing for decades, buys some powder of fuck knows what and snorts fuck knows how much, and has bad consequences, that makes Ketamine a dangerous drug? This is idiotic FUD, and the sad thing is that the reason you're spreading it is not even because you've seen too many commercials on TV, but simply because it gives you a reason to recount that story where your friend nearly died, which I guess gives you a feeling of having experience and authority. *They are still mass produced for veterinary purposes.
No. It's regulated to prevent ABUSE by monopolies.
That's why it's absurd to tell someone they can't take a photo in public of something in plain view.
Great banner although many of the signs in the background are clearly absurd. Context?
[Lake Victoria](http://maps.google.com/maps?q=33708&amp;hl=en&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;ll=-0.845917,32.937012&amp;spn=7.74959,10.283203&amp;t=h&amp;z=7&amp;om=1)
You forgot "so, " after each one of those claims. 
I scored 17 of 20 too, but I'm not sure that I like the comments given on the page with the results where it says     **You scored 17 of 20 boobs!** "Thanks for taking my test!  Be sure to tip your waitress. She has to pay for her implants."  [The Real Breasts/Fake Breasts Test](http://www.okcupid.com/tests/4030924596596610276/Real-Breasts-Fake-Breasts) In most cases I just simply wrote real on those which I considered natural. I like the real ones better, and I **definitely not** like the big unnatural ones. I simply like natural boobs. The size is not important. I have also heard that when you do this kind of surgery there is a risk to loose your sensitivity in the nipples and for several women I have met they value this sensitivity a lot. I'm not a cathegorical no sayer though, it is up to every woman to choose, but I think this thing with big boobs is quite hyped and also wrong.
Thanks for generalizing me and 300 million people as being completely incapable of feeling the emotions you feel. This certainly doesn't feel condescending or anything. BREAKING: Australians are the only ones who know what true love is, everyone else is full of shit!
You pseudo-intellectual racists are all such fun!
The solution is to reduce the power of the Federal government to strict and "optimistic" Constitutional levels ("optimistic": debates over interpretation are decided automatically in favor of the one that results in less government).  Then there would be very little to fight over at the national level. Big government means big money which means big corruption.  Why are adults continually surprised by this?  Millennia of history shows the relationship is utterly predictable.
Harvard cum laude Mira Sorvino not on the list?  Shame. Plus, Elisabeth Shue went to *Dartmouth*, I'll have you know, not Wellesley and "Harvard University".  Good soccer player.  Don't believe everything you read in Wikipedia. EDIT: And another thing, what's up with all the film stars?  How about [Susan Orlean](http://images.google.com/images?hl=en&amp;q=susan+orlean)?  I've had the hots for her for ages, even if she is twenty years my senior and happily married and all.
Thank you for your contribution!  It made me laugh even though it was sad!  He's sooooo cute!
sounds like being on mushrooms.
5?
perhaps i was counting one of yours.
I work for a gigantic national bank and as an employee I get no fees on a lot of that stuff, plus there are atm's everywhere, like in our building and 3 or 4 within 4 miles of my house. I usually get enough cash to last me 3 or 4 days, and Micky D takes plastic now  so breakfast is covered.  And as my little way of sticking it to The Man, I sit and read reddit instead of working. Heh!  
I like this idea.  But it's not clear to me how git is different in this regard.  It sounds like he wants to use git to produce a diff per-changeset that would then be processed by some external tool.  I would think you could do this with any changeset-based scm.
Cheney has become laughable. If not for his position he would be as impotent as Newt Gingrich has become.
So they're for everyone being allowed to choose harm for themselves, but not for others. Interesting.
nice but I like the "before and after" t-shirt better:  http://adsoftheworld.com/media/ambient/clinica_marquez_shirt
Who are we to make fun of Mar's face?!? I'm sure it didn't ask to look that way.  Have some compassion!
[Poe's Law](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Poe's+Law) Without a winking smiley or other blatant display of humor, it is impossible to create a parody of Fundamentalism that SOMEONE won't mistake for the real thing.
This is fucking crap. The whole of it. What's more, you've learned absolutely nothing, have you? Nothing here tells me anything about how you view the world. Do you or do you not believe that energy efficiency can increase 6000%? That's 2000% for baseload + lifting people out of poverty, and another 200% multiplied on top of that to substitute petrol. Do you or do you not believe this? Just answer the fucking question. If you answer yes then you are retarded and we can end this discussion. I'm not interested in debating the issue. You're right, I **dismiss it out of hand**. As fucking ludicrous. And just glancing at your line of crap above, there's not a single thing I see that isn't entirely ridiculous hyping. The kind of hyping common among magical thinkers, irrationalists ... *greens*. I mean for fuck's sake, I regard them all as **subhuman** and you've done everything possible to associate yourself to them. One may talk to a dog for one's own amusement, but thinking the dog talks back is self-delusion. I don't go in for self-delusion.
You know, I hadn't seriously considered that angle of it.  If true, it's too bad Pelosi shows this ill-placed restraint now.  Speakers Gingrich and Livingston showed no such compulsion when they impeached Clinton, and that was despite the fact that both of them were having an extramarital affair at the time!  (Not with each other.  Boy, would that have upset the religious right.)  But then, they didn't lie about their affairs under oath either.
I'm getting a kick out of squarehappy's reply.
1. brute force  2. sledgehammer  3. brute force and a sledgehammer 
Your points are stupid.  Why would they take out Pat Tillman and not Noam Chomsky et al.?  Maybe because he was in fucking Afghanistan and him getting killed wouldn't be that fucking surprising.  Jesus, are you really that thick?
We need something to distract from the 70% of Americans who want Gonzo out. Rumsfeld is willing to look like an ass on camera in a vain hope to change media coverage. Even the public widely lampooning him is better for the administration, than letting the focus remain on Gonzo.
Unless he can take it to bed with him, it is somewhat of a hollow victory.
I feel that using walmart as a free atm is actually abusing them, but I see your point.
I'm hoping PyPy does away with the GIL eventually. There's basically no hope that CPython can; it wouldn't be CPython anymore. I've gotten mixed signals on the feasibility of that. (Probably because there's mixed signals on the feasibility of PyPy in general.)
A subtle difference is that "I don't believe a god is possible" as opposed to "There is no God".  The first one is a rejection of your theistic claim that "God exist" so it is passive and does not require faith. This is a rejection of your claim(disbelief)of a god since it does not meet the burden of proof. Could a god exist? Sure but it isn't too likely so why believe in a god, Zeus/Odin/Unicorn etc.? The other is a faith based belief since it is making a claim that "God does not exist". This belief is active and the burden of proof falls to this believer to prove that god does not exist which isn't very likely.
No we really don't. We need to have enforceable rights to our data.
At the risk of sounding stupid... how is it not?  I'm not trying to argumentative, I'm simply uninformed.
When she smacks his nose, he looks up at her like *bitch*.
Maybe you select the people you know.
Man, perfect response to an absurd article.  Why do people like Frank Pastore get to have such an influence?  Maybe we should actually team up with Al Qaeda to get rid of the fundamentalist right-wing church.  The world would be a better place... (Just kidding of course, I can have as much love for those wackos as much as I can for everyone else)
I guess this means that Tancredo is the Republican candidate for those voters who want to elect a completely batshit insane nutjob because the current Administration doesn't go far enough...
cut it out with the death toll already, it's a buzz kill.
Worship of cult figures is definitely not attractive to intelligent people.
Somebody has a case of the Mondays!
Also, can you give me an example of what can be written with Haskell / Lisp / Ruby closures that can't be done with Java? I'm not saying there does not exist such an example.  We both agree that Java closures are more limited than the other languages.  I just haven't seen any examples. That would help me understand your argument immensely.
Finally something entertaining... Bit worried about the guy who wants to fuck a sandwich though...
Downmodded for wasting my time with self-pitying paranoid whining. Edit - And PS - I just checked the details on that post.  2 up, 2 down.  Oooohhh yeessss...  there's totally a HUGE conspiracy against you!  2 downmods?  Man, that's like the whole of Reddit is against you!  I sooooooo feel your pain and oppression.  I'm sure it's everything you can do not to go slit your wrists now.
Yes! My favourite Gaysian!!
&gt; *It's very strange, as an outsider, to observe the embattled minority and martyresque sentiments posted here and elsewhere on the internet... Atheism is a belief, but that doesn't make it a religion. What makes atheism a religion is its rabid followers...* I've seen thread after thread on Reddit insisting Atheism is neither a belief nor a religion, and something always seems a little off in the fervor of the defense.  Then along comes a post such as the one linked: &gt; *"The bookstores have noticed us.  You can see we've got a ways to go yet. I'm going to have to insist that everyone go out and buy these books. After you've finished reading them, I expect you to write a book of your own, so we can fill up a wide rack of our own."* Proselytize much? 
And all you need to do is visit 4chan or Fark for confirmation of this.
Ruby's a really nice language, and there's certainly nothing wrong with being a big fan of a good language. Fanboyism is bad when it leads people to refuse to acknowledge any flaws in their favorite language (or favorite whatever), and when it causes people to launch gratuitous assaults on alternative languages. Those are the Ruby (or any other language) fanboys that everyone objects to.
I don't get it. On *To Catch a Predator* they always have the guy arrested. This time they let him get away with it twice, no cops or mention of arrest. Why?
Well, I couldn't read the article but if you can't get laid while less smart people can then maybe you aren't very smart.  It's really a case of what you're smart about.
IT doesn't matter. Never ever going to happen.
Upmodded for the use of the word "Panopticon"
Diflucan for candida infection treatment is antifungal agents, that can be use by several administration route. Is available in tablets, oral suspension, cream and intravenouns solution. The indications and use of Diflucan (fluconzole) is in vaginal candidiasis.
What will people think when they hear that you're a Jesus freak? What will people do when they find that its true?
&gt; So what did our direct ancestors look like compared to our evolutionary cousins [Neanderthals]? Well, sadly for our gym performance, the earliest moderns were characterized by more atrophied bodies with equally large brains. Compared to Neanderthals, the brains to brawn ratio of moderns was significantly increased. In fact, compared to other animals, humans are primarily walking brains.  [Built Like A Neanderthal](http://johnberardi.com/articles/nutrition/built1.htm). &gt; And every minute you spend working out is a minute you're not learning anything  Hear hear.
i love my mom and dad
Except that when Clinton was impeached, Gore was not, so if Clinton was convicted, Gore and not the Speaker of the House, would be President.
Even responding to you isn't the same as vegetating. Figuring out how to cause the maximum psychological destruction to your ego is actually intellectually stimulating.
You think i disagree? :)
Yeah, get a Land Rover if need be.
&gt; It requires no faith to deny the existence of entities for which there is no evidence. Of course it does.  It actually depends upon which kind of atheist you are.  And an atheist with a higher IQ is well aware of the fact. Belief that a deity does not exist -- requires faith Absence of a belief that a deity exists -- does not require faith 
And coupled with a technological means for large numbers of people to meet and trade...
i like many other things more than suicide, but this isnt the place to list and link them all
&lt;shudder&gt; Where's that line from?
Is everyone here clear that, with this purchase, Murdoch will have control over the composition of the Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) along with the other Dow averages? 
I did not include a single race-based adjective in my comment, why are you calling me a racist? Islam is not a race, it is a religion.  There are Muslims of every skin colour and national origin.  Religion is an *idea*, and when you are no longer allowed to criticize *ideas*, then you lose your right to free speech.
Wow, this spam is spamtactular!  I can't wait to give them my real name, my real email, and bank account numbers!  Just so I can see titties!
Considering that porn itself is a falsification of women, this sentence is accurate and could be clarified further by removing the words *today* and *just.*   
From the Sherman Antitrust act: &gt; "Every person who shall monopolize, or attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person or persons, to monopolize any part of the trade or commerce among the several States, or with foreign nations, shall be deemed guilty of a felony" EDIT:  I think you might be right and the language has evolved; now "monopoly" means single organization in a particular trade, but 100 years ago, it may have referred to  such an organization that was also abusive.   In either case, this is tangential to the issue of a *press* monopoly, since they're not doing price-fixing, but "information fixing." 
Eh, I love the disclaimer. So ironic, so true.
Heh, was that Trigger Happy TV?
Find out how you can land on the right job for you. This website has tips and tricks to get the right job we deserve. 
Have you come up with a plan yet?  No?  Okay, first of all, do you care whether your death is slow and/or painful?
Yes, Ron Paul for Pres!
If only such a flag existed.  All we have is a flag that represents hatred, corruption, stupidity, and Republicans.
For your comparison (to sugar, corn oil...) to be reason you have to show how it can be transposed to energy. In my opinion it isn't because there is already an appreciable bunch of equipment, of various sizes/origins/principles/..., enabling anybody, anywhere, to produce "his own" energy, in many forms (electricity, which is particularly pertinent here because it powers most of the stuff around us, included). There is no such thing for sugar, corn oil, starch, copper... Am I wrong? Why? &gt;&gt; Grid loss is approx 1/3  &gt;&gt; are huge powerplants (or 'farms') 1/3 more efficient than small ones? &gt; Yes, exactly- we were comparing huge, centralized powerplants against small, local ones. Indeed. My hypothesis is that the main difference between the two approaches is the grid. Centralized powerplants are useless without a grid, therefore grid-related losses impede the centralized approach. The marginal gain on efficiency (in the sense of this word used in physics) granted by centralized plants over small ones (a few percent) is largely inferior to gridloss. Did I miss a parameter?
Which god in particular?  Is it okay to deny the existence of a particular god as long as you believe in one of the others?
I think you are projecting your own logical stance onto the atheist masses.  I would suggest that it is a real possibility that, contrary to what you believe, the vast majority of those calling themselves atheists have an active belief in the non-existence of god/god(s).
I hereby cast my vote. Let's remove EE from the interweb altogether. I hate it so much that my nose is now bleeding.
[The power of an individual's vote](http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_m1511/is_n11_v17/ai_18762289)  is actually greater in a republic, or rather would be in one that was districted fairly.
You do post a lot and have a very visible agenda that makes the less mature guys nervous and uncomfortable; it's not surprising that you've attracted some level of trollmodding. Drawing attention to it is feeding the trolls... It's just a website.
That's what I want to comment on -- C setup is pretty much there by default.  You can read in flymake's info pages that other languages can also benefit from the feature, but last time I tried it was not as easy.  Might have something to do with the fact that I have not spend more than 15 minutes trying to flymake-check Perl and Ruby code, still.
&gt;  carrying stitches and bolts from pre-OO days  Which days would those be?
now you're talking out of your rear end. references or stfu. not only that, you have clearly no idea of what India is like. India is composed of hundreds of different peoples with different languages and cultures, and everyone wants their own state or country. No goverment can start splitting off countries willy-nilly.
Mass immigration destroys America!
Pat Tillman was also an atheist.
Wow I guess I'm getting old.  The days of procedural, 'structured' programming, when breaking up code into functions instead of using gotos was state-of-the-art. Python started there, and had to stitch in OO. It isn't because it's beautiful that you have to explicitly declare the 'self' object as the first parameter of a method.
Well, it was certainly broken by the time Reagan got elected.
I've never used Ruby for GUI stuff, so I can't quite grok why this is so awesome? Are Ruby's current GUI libraries rather complicated/C++ like?   
grauenwolf is right, the idea of protecting source code is ignorant, it can't be done, and the real truth of the matter is, it isn't worth protecting anyway.  Source code isn't that valuable, the developers who understand it are.  Outside the context of those developers, the code is practically worthless.  Anyone who thinks their code is so special that it needs protection from the outside world doesn't have a grip on reality.
tables work much better in org-mode.  otherwise -- yes, publishing can be done much better out of muse.  but the parent talks about GTD -- which is a hack in muse, and almost ingrained in org-mode.
"Fool me once, shame on you. Fool me twice... er... can't be fooled again..."
You fell for that "IRS Audit Warning" email?
Actually you can thank Ruby for Pythonistas' politeness. I remember some rabidness on the newsgroups when Perl was the only other game in town and Python was on the rise. Guido himself sneered at Ruby once, in the early days.
This is like the "how to be a stud" guide I got with my free subscription to Men's Health Magazine. It included such helpful gems as  1) Don't wear mesh shirts  2) Don't wear cowboy boots with shorts  3) Don't drink beer directly out of the keg. In other words don't be an idiot.
&gt; Wasn't the whole point of the electoral college to disenfranchise slaves by allowing the slave states to count slaves at 3/5 of a person in order to increase their voting influence? um, no
SO WHAT?
Breast Enlargement Pills herbally designed to enhance your system and  develop tissues that increase your bust.Breast Gain Plus that Enlarge your breast size in weeks. 
Excellent point.  So one way to guard against impeachment, is for Vice President to be so vile and the President so deep in shit that any talk of impeaching them coming from the Speaker of House can be spun to look like nothing but an early bid for the white house.  Man, those guys thought of everything!  (Just kidding, Dick Cheney obviously did the thinking for the both of them.)
Very accurate.  If you're an obese suicidal chainsmoking Native American taxicab driver with angina who hates his job, is cheating on his girlfriend and basejumps regularly, then you are indeed probably already dead.
&gt; to really matter when dissolved in a million cubic miles of ocean, it has to be really, really hot Is it a joke? Many used to dump the waste in sea, but the risks to do so appeared clearly approx 40 years ago. As soon as in 1972 nearly all concerned states (even heavy-nukies like France, US, Russia and UK) signed it and ceased most, if not all, such dumps. Parties extended it in 1996. There is a fair [exposé on WP](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marine_Dumping). &gt; Carbon 14 This is all a matter of concentration. 
You, my friend, have been paid a visit by #The Douchebag Downmodders. These pale, simpering outcasts get the same kick from clicking on that Down Arrow that you or I might get from a night of rafter-rattling, animalistic boot-knocking. Indeed, downmodding is the closest these clammy, greasy-haired clones will ever get to sexual intercourse, due in no small part to the fact that most of them still live with their mothers and in many cases even share a bed with them. Rather than become aggravated, which simply adds to their titillation, pity is really called for. Every time you enjoy a night with that special someone, purchase a drink at a bar, experience the awe of a mountain vista or the nighttime desert sky, or score a big business success that earns you the accolades of other successful people, take a moment to remember those for whom, due to their deep abiding fears and weakness and their addiction to manual self-gratification, all these natural human joys will be forever denied. Of course in the extremely unlikely event that you should run into a Douchebag Downmodder outside their mother's house, a pitiless thrashing is the order of the day.
Alcoholics Anonymous has a higher rate of recidivism than the atheist alternative. The atheist alternative also doesn't go for giving up alcohol entirely, only to change the relationship. So it's not only possible to do what you're describing, it's effective.
Please explain how that works.
On closer examination, it appears to be porn.
Bitch bitch bitch.  Then come to the comments, and discover that [context has been provided by the community](http://www.beyondtv.org/nato/crap/craps.htm) (shamelessly purloined from below) THE SYSTEM SOLVES ITSELF!
&gt;Then again it's like putting a padlock on a turd. Pretty much. But he's imagining hordes of people wanting the whole library of his crappy 'Shops of himself standing in front of landmarks in an ugly blue sweater.
Where is the so-called liberal press on this? Things are worsening, who knew?
If anyone is wondering, he bought it for **$5 billion** (heard it this morning on NBC).
Racist and bad tasting. That company's marketing department sweated every penny of their salaries.
Downvoted for having to "register" to see the test results.
Being that there's no practical difference between not believing something exists and believing something does not exist, I don't feel it's important to make such distinctions that are nothing more than a matter of semantics.  My belief that leprechauns don't exist may sound like a faith-based position, but it logically follows from a lack of any evidence in leprechauns, and more to the point, follows naturally from what a pedantic twit might insist on describing strictly as a lack of belief in their existence. But, hey, what do I know with my tiny IQ?
What about the Reagan robot? Doesn't that count?
She makes a note that she doesn't want women to start wearing burqas, but her friend, the oppressed orthodox jew, "must feel so hot" because the local culture stipulates that women abide by this subservient bs. When I was in college 5 years ago, girls wouldn't talk to you unless you were completely groomed, tanned, etc., so yeah, it happens. And seeing as more and more porn available online features girls who aren't stars, but more regular girls earning a few hundred to screw on camera, the level of  girl you see on megarotic or empornium is fast approaching the level of girl you'd see on a normal college campus.
porn substitutes as sex for people would otherwise have trouble obtaining it.
So all county electoral officials in each county that destroyed records are involved in a conspiracy to rig the election? And none of them have talked? The argument for fraud seems to be that voters in some  polling places voted in the majority for Democrats or Democrat issues except for the presidential election where they voted Republican. Just like in Colorado in 2004 where voters picked Bush over Kerry, but nonetheless voted for Democrats in the state houses of legislature, toggling control of both houses from the GOP to the Democrats. So the election must have been rigged in Colorado too. Where is the outrage, why are both the MSM and KosKids ignoring this injustice? Occam's Razor would simply explain it: The voters thought Kerry was a loser ("I voted for the war before I voted against it" or was it "I voted against the war before I voted for it"). Maybe they held their nose when they voted for Bush, but vote they did.
I __knew__ the moon landing was a hoax!
My God, I found my own name on that list!
oh god no my photo will be taken ! oh no how will i ever cope how precious
NO! STILL CREEPY!!!!  And I HATE writing in caps and using lots of exclamation points!!!
Not sure if he wants Novak the whiney chickenhawk's endorsement.... I like Ron's honesty, non-interventionist views, but he is the typical libertarian white-bread geek who's street cred is suspect.
I hope she takes them for a cool mill.
Yes I imagine a site that is basically a list of links is probably the wrong place to put links...
In the city I live in, the vast majority of the foreclosures are clustered in two places, poor, black, neighborhoods, where home prices don't exceed $100k and average around $75k, and starter home developments where prices are sub $150k. Neighborhoods with prices &gt; $500k see few foreclosures, in my city anyways.
I'm Australian, but I agree with most of the American comments on this article. So Aussies are the only ones who have 'true' friends? What a load of shit. Americans and indeed anyone else, obviously have pretty much the same things, they just call them different names. I have been to America and I have some Yankee mates and all I can say is if you treat a bloke with respect, 90% of the time you get it straight back.
All the better!
Hyperbole hardly proves your point. You don't even leave your house before benefiting from tax dollars, whether you want to or not.
Cue George Carlin's bit on [Stuff](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MvgN5gCuLac).
If this had been in place previously Gore would have been president. That fact has caused MANY Democrats to say Bush wasn't elected. Now that the situation is reversed, and the "great injustice" is to be remedied, they want none of it.  Remember this is not, and never has been an argument over right and wrong. It's about winning at any cost. Both sides are exactly what they claim the other to be, and that is why this is so entertaining.
&gt;Same thing. Let me use an extreme example "shinkis shirt has a flavor of a slave owner". If my shirt said "black people are made for picking cotton" you wouldn't know whether or not I was a slave owner.  But that doesn't mean that you shouldn't comment on the connection. &gt;It is called "Poisoning the well" and it is a form of ad hominem attack. You're wrong.  Ad hominem is about attacking a person to discredit his argument.  rgladstein didn't even make an argument.  He just stated his position.  There was no argument to discredit.  I couldn't have launched an ad hominem argument against him even if I had wanted to. Even putting that insurmountable hurdle aside, the idea that this would be "poisoning the well" is ridiculous.  Suggesting that his position was neo-atheist wasn't an attack on him.  It was the premise for a possible explanation of his outlook. Any kind of ad hominem argument is necessarily superfluous to the primary argument.  But identifying his attitude as neo-atheist was neither superfluous nor an argument.  It was an observation providing a premise for an analysis. Please take a hiatus from mentioning logical fallacies on the internet.
Fantastic! About time.
Yeah, I read it as number two, which is certainly alot less moronic than suggesting that having the machines reviewed created some sort of risk at the next election.  He is, if I read it right, essentially saying that the security experts got to cheat, using information they normally wouldn't have. I can't say I know whether or not he is right, but it's certainly less stupid that the headline would make it sound.
I'm not sure what you're all arguing about. People like people of similar intelligence level and social class. Intelligent people are more attracted to intelligent people, and vice versa. In our society, we can tell who is intelligent by how they speak (cursing, vocabulary), what clothes they wear (mostly signifying social class), and what social mannerisms they have (holding doors, offering to pay, etc). As far as intelligence, I've met many girls that can't get enough of my talking about politics/math/computers/cognitive science/neurobiology/natural language processing. Usually those are the girls that can contribute something to the conversation on the same topics, or just girls generally interested in learning. So in my personal experience, it's not at all unusual for an intelligent girl to get very sexually excited from a stimulating intelligent conversation. That probably doesn't hold for the *average* girl, but who here is really interested in attracting the *average* girl...
I just think we should add some light to the subject.
What does "I call BS XXX" mean?
No problem, whites are good people in fact.
Al Gore would be president if this change happened nation-wide a few years back. But since it won't help the Democrats this time, it's no longer a good idea.
and that's supposed to mean what exactly?
That's got to be the worst lolcat I've ever seen
That's got to be the worst lolcat I've ever seen
1. Stalking is creepy and dangerous. O'Reilly sexually harassed a woman and paid dearly for it. He doesn't stalk anyone. So he doesn't deserve to be stalked. 2. Putting up signs all over his neighborhood just makes you look like an idiot.  3. Does he have kids? Family living in that house? How about thinking of them. They can't help that their old man is a creep. They're innocent victims.  What people like O'Reilly and Coulter and Limbaugh need more than anything is to be ignored. They're *nobody.* The blogger honored Bill O. with hours of set-up work, time, money and attention. It was an honor O'Reilly most definitely does not deserve.
&gt;Why would a cat with something like that be "destroyed"? I'm guessing they end up in shelters, don't get adopted because people think the cat is somehow sick or damaged, and they end up euthanized.  I'm with you on the mutts. My best pets have been mixed breeds, strays, etc. They even seem to be just a bit smarter than the average purebred fancy critter.
Stepanov didn't say that. He basically punted the question. We should still be using C everywhere then. Such great wisdom.
amy was slurring, but church actually sounded great.
All I got was a rock.
At first I thought you were advocating for the green party, then that last line just completely floored me.  It's an interesting idea.  I agree that our system would be very different then, but I'm not exactly sure how it would work to our benefit.  Imagine trying to ask him to support grant money for school. "Hi, Congressman, I was wondering if I could ask for your support on school grants..."  "Grants!  You want grants!  You want free money!  for school!  You know how much I make, doing the people's work, nothing.  NOTHING!" I don't know.  In all seriousness, I would worry about a poverty vow possibly making them more susceptible to bribery.   In answer to your question, we're taking on Pelosi and Conyers because they're the best shot that we currently have at impeachment.  However, there was a precedent set that [an official can be impeached after they leave office](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/William_W._Belknap).  It's tough to see that happening even if we get a Democratic President since, hey, they're going to be the inheritors of all those powers that Bush has stocked up on, and they would never use them for evil.  So far Kucinich has been the only one to really bring up impeachment.  I don't know where Ron Paul stands on the issue, but that would be one way to secure my vote is for a presidential candidate to unequivocally state, **"If elected, I will investigate the possibly impeachable offenses by the current administration."**
At some point you won't be able to buy a new PC from one of the major companies without buying Vista too. Spoke to Dell recently -- you can only get XP on a new system if you order by phone and then only by the end of this month.
and in cases of actual abuse including being drugged..not only will the police laugh it off but so will sexual assault services... i know from painful experience
Other than for a lack of journalistic ethics, I wonder why publishers couldn't simply include some kind of abbreviation in a photo credit to admit that its been digitally enhanced (e.g. "EFC"-enhanced for clarity) How they can justify any other kind of manipulation is beyond me.
The ACM seems to do the same thing. Always pisses me off when google gives me a page full of ACM page results that i can't view.
Our country is so fucked up!
Unless the guy at the firing range says that anyone who qualifies gets to be a cop. Trust me, the damn thing gets REALLY inaccurate. I guess I can admit to that now.
I don't understand why anyone would want to have sex with a tree.
i decided to do something productive. i stocked up on ammo and food for the inevitable and upcoming revolution. (you know, when bush declares marshal law and stuff) but don't tell anyone.
3geiqwe
yes the site is, the comments of another link, not so much
20 yards away? That's only 60 feet. There shouldn't be three holes at all. Just one big one.
Why would anyone buy this? Jewpaste works great for me.
They don't fear death because of what they believe comes afterward, so they have nothing to lose. But that means we don't, either. We could tact-nuke the hell out of the whole middle east, and theoretically, it would be just fine by them. We have no reason not to. It may not be a deterrent, but it would be a victory. Or develop a proven technology that captures and imprisons their souls after leaving the body.
Nice to know it's _supposed_ to work - it should be easier to make it do so. It wouldn't have been too hard to adapt even from scratch, though, I reckon. Well, cool.
*Stupid moron...*? Are there other kinds?
Who does that?  I thought it was against the contracts merchants have with credit card companies to charge more for credit card users.
Larry King is a real reporter again? (*head explodes*)
B-b-but it is for the Greater Good!
Thats comforting to know after state sanctioned hackers successfully tampered with the voting machines in California.
&gt; If I believe that slavery or pedophilia is wrong, do you expect me to be tolerant of those beliefs? You've never met relativists, have you? Depending how principled shinkis is in his relativism (if one can be principled about something that is inherently hypocritical) then the answer to your question is 'yes'. &gt; Please define 'Neo-Atheist' Neo-Atheist is a smear term that's a degenerate form of the semi-smear term New Atheism used to denote Richard Dawkins and his contemporaries.
There's nothing 'special' about that subway station.  Anyone can use it, and the writers point was that it is where the express subway to City Hall (where the mayor works) stops. Why that's a good idea should be obvious to anyone who thinks about the security of the mayor for the city which has suffered the largest terrorist attacks in history.
Find all necessary info related to obtain visa to visit, work and settle down in USA. 
Exactly. I have the right to say whatever I want, but that doesn't mean you have to listen to it, promote it, fund it, or agree with it. A *right* to free speech doesn't mean you won't be held accountable for it.  If someone makes racist comments, we are also free to go "hey, what a douchebag". That's what's going on here.  People are saying "we associate your product with douchebags, I hope that's what you were going for". Judging by Home Depot's response, you'd think that they were  about to release a line of feminine products.
Just like it's ok to do the same to "terrorists"
ratings
Think of it like a raid array, where the two engine variants represent a pair of drives and the life expectancy of the military aircraft as the application. From the article on its own I'm not convinced its a waste. If you watched the recent NASA STS-117 mission you can see they dipped into some of the available computer redundency and ran into troubles. 
If notions were banished by mere evidence, I doubt religion would have survived this long.
I liked Bazaar better than Mercurial, except for one fundamental flaw: it couldn't handle files with non-ASCII chars in my Windows box. I could work around it by using cygwin, but for me it's a very very serious problem.
"Trust us! Just draw an X and we will tell you who you voted for."  Quit your whining.  A voting machine can be defrauded, but so can a paper ballot.  I say we just give Bush another term.
&gt;Who is it again that wants to abort babies Nobody wants to abort babies. You are a perfect example of the sickness infecting the Republican party today.
I like how it asks for your birthday to confirm you're over 18... after you finish.
Then you should call the Pentagon and yell at them for using your tax dollars for such ideas. I still don't know where you get the 2000% figure, or the new 6000% figure. And you're (admittedly) still not listening.
No, they're not... I've read that piece before and she's wrong. What infuriates me about this woman and this essay is that Ms. Wolf pretty much labels ALL men who watch porn as being shallow and, by extension, directly responsible for women's low sense of sex value. I am not making excuses for those who watch porn, but women are directly responsible for their own sense of self-confidence and self-esteem. Don't blame men for the inadequacies of women.
Another piece of dung blog post from the king of plagiarism/copy &amp; paste from the Canadian non working disability and welfare cheat pusgut beaj. He says he lives on Easy Street courtesy of the working taxpayers.
A variety of ways to save gas, save money and help economy. 
for whom ever this this shit is stoopid.  u r right. but gess wat, i like my lafs. Fa Kin Su Pah!
I guess I assumed there would be some way to determine what our politicians actually owned -- thus certifying their "poverty" and eliminating much chance of bribery. In any case I understand your points.  I only suggest that the "best shot you have" is more likely an illusion than any real chance at change. What I'm really getting at here is how can people really know the true hearts of there elected leaders? Without enforcing sacrifice and abstinence how else can we be certain that their convictions are not influenced by greed, which is so utterly pervasive in our current system. Imagine a system where corporations are pitted against an utterly non-corruptible government. Investigating the impeachable offenses ... doesn't really address, in my mind, the true problems.  It is wealth, influence, and power that twist our current system.  Both political parties are corrupted.  Impeaching or not is just a sideline to the real issues IMO.
I'm Australian and grew up in Oz. Have lived in the States for 17 years. Here's the spray: American mates/Australian mates - roughly the same. Same ratio of dick-heads to good blokes just about anywhere. Biggest difference- The Australian sense of humor is more developed towards the ironic. Australians are also more casually hedonistic probably from a consequence of minimal religious guidance. There you have it. If you don't agree you can stick your head up a dead bear's bum.
&gt; Have I claimed to be the expert in this field? You have implied that you have understood it, but your actual words have shown that you clearly do not. For example, you told me above that you didn't approve of using quantum states to model light. You clearly didn't understand what that meant, as you are still banging on about whether or not light is a wave or particle. A quantum state is neither of these things, it is a different object entirely. I have asked you exactly where you think these models of nature break down, but you have yet to say anything. Now about you "calling bullshit" on relativity. You clearly haven't interpreted the model it provides on nature correctly. This is some of what the model says: First of all, forget everything you think you know about light becoming a singularity. There are no widely accepted models which purport such a thing. Secondly, light always travels at the speed of light, when observed by an inertial observer. It doesn't matter whether or not the emitting object is moving. This is can be quite a confusing concept, but I assure you, there are many things in existence around the world that would not be working if this weren't the case. What is an inertial observer? That is someone who could look at two balls of different mass, and conclude that they were not moving with respect to each other (for example, floating in space away from galaxies is an inertial observer). With this in mind, I think you should realise that you have grossly misunderstood relativity. If you wish, I can point you out to several websites or accessible texts which may help you get a better understanding of this incredible place we are living in. I offer to help with any questions you may have that the books don't answer. &gt; It was independent thought that did not assume that the current theories are set in stone and unfalible. When was the last time YOU did that? I have patiently stated over and over, that no one thinks the current models are infallible, and many scientists are either looking to break the models by doing novel experiments, or building new models that explain currently unexplained phenomena. &gt; Yet you also claim that Physics starts with observing how the real world works and trying to model it in math. Anyone who starts trying to prove a conclusion is not a scientist. Modelling the universe **is not** proving a conclusion. It is a very remarkable coincedence that we can model aspects of the universe at all! And that we can do it in the language of mathematics. There is no reason why that should be. It is a miracle of sorts. Beyond that, there are no conclusions being drawn. The models could posit any number of hypotheses, and they do vary widely. &gt; The overwhelming group of physicists spend their entire lives trying to reprove theories that have never had critical examination within the field of physics, or from external groups. I take it you have never looked at a peer-reviewed journal. Because if you had, you would see that the exist opposite of what you are claiming is what happens. Take a trip to the local university library. Do you think all this work is done by a bunch of simultaneously deluded people? It looks to me that you feel that modern physics is not questioning the models laid down by people in the last century. Things like relativity and quantum mechanics, that don't make intuitive sense. Am I correct? You asked about relativity, and I provided you with just *one* of many ways people are looking to break it. There are experimental physicists who are collecting data and building instruments that may be able to detect where it goes wrong. There are some theoretical physicists who are tinkering with the model relativity provides, there are others looking for new ones (especially with regards to general relativity). But very few people are looking to break special relativity. The reason is this: it has stood up to years and years and years of experiments that have tried to break. And not a single one has come close. There are scientists who have said, "OK, so maybe special relativity is only approximately correct. We may have missed a subtlety. In what ways can special relativity be wrong but still match with the experimental data we have?" And these guys are looking for Lorentz violation. Believe me, there are definitely people out there looking for brand new models, or change the current ones we accept for now. Did you know, that no one knew about radio waves? Then Maxwell predicted with mathematics that there could be electromagnetic radiation. And then people started building antennae and receivers? This is a clear case of the mathematical models *actually working*. In summary: 1. You asked me what light was. I explained it is described as a quantum state. You don't even understand what that is (which is fair enough), but then you claim that it was wrong! How can you say that something you don't understand is wrong? 2. You told me to stop accepting the current models with blind faith. Question relativity, you say. I explained to you, that people (people that are way smarter than me) are doing exactly that, and they are collecting data, doing experiments that might show us a new path. Despite me telling you this, you still think we are not questioning. Do you still think this? Do you have any further questions or queries?
What are you 6 years old? Easily the most naive statement i've seen.
Maybe I'm stereotyping, but that doesn't look like the silhouette of a suicidal guy.  He seems in shape, good hair cut, nicely fitting clothes, he's lean, and he's tall.  I bet most people who're close to suicide have let their hair get shabby, they won't care about their clothes, they probably have gotten fatter, etc.
I couldn't agree more.
It bothers me solely due to the consumer attitudes they promote regardless of where they get their stories.  That might be what the grandparent is talking about.
There is no reason why this problem couldn't have been handled decently by now, with electronic machines that are reliable and have a paper trail. This whole thing is bullshit. We had plenty of time, and everybody knew it was a huge problem back in the last election. And the one before that. For chrissake!
So what, you can just pull an insightful analysis of the transition of Fra Angelico from his early style to the frescoes of San Marco right out of your ass?  There's nothing to learn from that?  Nothing meaningful, nothing that is connected to our human lives? Look, I'm a math and CS geek myself, but it seems really shallow and blinkered to think that the constraints of science and mathematics somehow naturally entrain a superior mind.  The humanities, the arts, even religion, are all capable of producing profound, beautiful thought that engages the highest human faculties.
Oh, come on. Don't you know that Yoda is just a puppet of the ruling elite?  
Come on man... really?  You are still making a belief statement, just splitting it into two parts, requiring, in fact, twice as much faith. 1) I don't believe a god is possible 2)I don't believe a god is likely.  They still have two words that define them as statements of faith, "I" and "believe." I know this is a big issue for atheists because if they are faith-based reasoners (as I postulate everyone on the planet is) then they would have to grant validity to the rationale given by Christians (or anyone else) for their beliefs. This is untenable and incredible unappealling to the atheist. But also, no matter how "subtle" the phrasing, ultimately unavoidable for the truly rational and logical thinker. That being said, I don't see WHY it should be so horrible, but then I acknowledge that most all of what I know or believe, I know or believe on faith. I'm okay with that.  I read a posting on reddit addressing this point in a different manner. It was called "What I Believe But Cannot Prove."  http://cosmicvariance.com/2007/04/11/what-i-believe-but-cannot-prove/ The point of which was made quite well, I thought. "...there isn’t anything that I believe that I can prove, aside from a limited set of ultimately sterile logical tautologies."
I know of at least one Shell station and one other (small brand) station that do it, and I've seen it elsewhere. The cash board has “cash discount” on top; the other board either doesn't have any special markings, or has “credit” on top. &gt; I thought it was against the contracts merchants have with credit card companies to charge more for credit card users. If that's true (and I seem to remember that it is, but I'm not sure), then either they're breaking the rules, the rules have changed, they've obtained special rules from the credit-card companies, or they're testing the argument that a cash discount (lowering the price for cash users) is different from charging more (raising the price) for credit users.
Jackass??? Nice. No, you are wrong. WRONG. The symbol of the BJP is the lotus flower, not the swastika. You can call me all the names you want. It doesn't make you right.
No, this is just an attempt to make a quick buck.  The dumbest thing is [w2o](http://www.w2oforwomen.com/).
What a sweetie!
Its like reading a retards thoughts.
Put it up your ass. This will destroy the chip, and can make for an interesting scene when you try to get through customs.
I think I'm beginning to understand the jihadists
Not funny
Your example is retail, though. Business channel sales are a very different breed of animal.
i'm not referring to suicide, i'm referring to the advertisement.  and the link comes from the same site, actually right below the (PIC) that is referred to in the title.  i was simply drawing attention to a page of the same site i found amusing without submitting a whole new link.
What do you believe that you cannot prove?
"Forced liquidation is execution"  Not true, look at AT&amp;T now
I'm "unleashing" my "false flag" right now, if you know what I mean!
Here's proof: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/BJP
In case anyone is wondering why the word “voting” is emboldened throughout the text, it's because raldi left his search query in the URL.
&gt; But, hey, what do I know with my tiny IQ? Exactly.  To suggest that "there's no practical difference between not believing something exists and believing something does not exist" is quite ridiculous and is a matter far removed from mere semantics.
"They're in their last throes.  Startiiiiiiiinnnngggg... NOW!" I also like how he refers to Gonzalez as a "good man" that he holds in high regard... and then lies about sending him to Ashcroft.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Andrea_Dworkin  She is not now, nor has ever been, porn worthy. Not the porn most people watch, anyway. I could go out on a limb and say this is jealousy, but it's just FUD. No studies (if those mean anything), just opinion.
&gt; yell at them for using your tax dollars for such ideas. They don't. I'm privileged to live in a first world country. &gt; I still don't know where you get the 2000% figure, or the new 6000% figure. And you're (admittedly) still not listening. Say something which proves you've understood anything I said and I'll listen better. Nuclear share of world electric production = 16%. Increase in nuclear to displace all world production = 1/16% = 6.25.  Increase in baseload capacity to bring the entire world up (and USA down) to a Western standard of living by 2050? 3.5. 3.5 x 6.25 = 21.87. That's 2000%. Increase in baseload capacity to handle transportation? 3x. So 2000% x 3x = 6000%. I probably screwed up the percentages, they should be higher than that.
Sounds like the path all intelligent people should take as a matter of nature. It's like the old saying; "If you aren't liberal before you're forty, and conservative after 40, there's something seriously wrong with you." If you haven't overcome your religious indoctrination by 30, and become a pure atheist by 40 then your brain is defectively programmed, and you have been poorly educated.
So I'm generally not a fan of cats (that whole not being able to breathe when I'm near them and all, or in a place that has had them) but that was great.
I use 10minutemail.com.  They generate a random looking domain to you, so that addresses do not get blocked + you can read your mail, if you "really really want" :) They gave me the address mail3263600@gorillaswithdirtyarmpits.com 
Dude, "pansypatrol"?
Yeah, it's so obvious that he thinks that Haskell is a panacea.  How can one possibly believe otherwise and call themselves a computer scientist in this day and age? Just look at all those Haskell links posted to reddit!
You fucking idiot, it's the symbol of the *Nazi* party. Of course it isn't the symbol of the BJP.
kissing is sexy
for Christs sake. my wife is that age and my children are the same age too. I cant imagine her thought process.
Utilizing experience gleaned in Ar Ramadi, Iraq as grounds for observing the potential 2008 race for United States President, the Educated Soldier, unabashedly Republican, makes surprising positive comments on behalf of Democratic Senator Biden.  He also explains why ground truths prohibit certain Iraq strategies from being viable tactics.
Ahem, basic logic. pcx99 statement: 60% want A, 40% want not A.  60% wins by majority rule, thus A gets implemented. Implies the 40% are 'silenced', their votes are 'stolen'. Alternative:  'not A' gets implemented. The 40% get their wishes fulfilled, they win. Alas, the other 60% are 'silenced', their votes are 'stolen'.
"i don't recall" is the new "define sex" ?
So is this blog being linked to as *evidence* of the dumbing-down of America, or what?
awww, they outlawed pirates?
No.
How California votes for a President is California's business. This reminds me of Bruce Springsteen's campaigning against Prop 187. We're not fools. Democrats will see this for what it is, and Republicans will rightly be offended, if perhaps for few reasons other than the practice we got defending the idea of the Electoral College in 2000. We elect Republican governors, we voted for Reagan, we'll vote GOP again someday. Like the rest of America, we pick a party for its politics and then, by and large, at election time we choose a candidate for what we consider that candidate's merits. But if I'm wrong, it's *still* none of the New Yorker's concern.
Mission Accomplished
Could you explain how, in practice, it is different then?
Fuck they whine don't they? Unlike the victims of countless other wars/conflicts etc., these people just can't let it go. Do you see the Ugandans or Russians (just a random selection) carrying on this much? No. They get on with things. I'm not saying the holocaust was good or even that it wasn't bad, what I am saying is that many people get fed up with hearing about it over and over as if it were the only bad thing to happen to a race of people. The survivors should count their stars they are still alive and that they have somewhere to live.
Now only if we can secede from the union. Petoria, anyone?
